After successfully infiltrating the base where Jack’s squad had
captured my fellow soldier Jimenez, I ran into what looked like a
laboratory. In the centre of the room, one of Jack’s men guarded the
dimly illuminated tubes with an automated machine gun. Unknown
distorted voices filled the room with agony. I hid behind some crates
and listened. ‚Humans< Cursed humans‛, one shouted. ‚You want
my power so much you don’t mind cutting me up?‛ another yelled. I
put down my gun and peeked through the crates. ‚This humiliation!
I should have killed you on the spot when I met you!‛. The tubes
contained demons. Some of them dismembered, others highly
malformed as if they had been through a series of experiments. ‚Give
them back< Give them back<‛, one of them begged. ‚My hands<
My feet< Give them back to me<‛ Upon hearing this, my heart
started throbbing and I stood up. ‚I’m angry, but I see now why God
cursed the humans... They’re unsalvageable! Their wretched souls
are stuck deep inside their bodies!‛, the demon in the most inner
tube shouted. ‚That’s right! Curse me all you want. The strong
demons will become new weapons, the others spare parts. Now
THIS is science!‛, Jack’s soldier answered. ‚The fusion of technology
and demons!‛ Realising I had snuck up behind him, he turned
around and we soon thereafter emerged in combat. ‚Humans...
Cursed humans...! Kill each other! Kill each other! Kill each other
without end... Until you die, we shall be at your heels...‛ Not before
finishing him off I realised that I was no whit better than he was.
This excerpt is based on a scene halfway through the game Shin
Megami Tensei: Strange Journey (Atlus, 2010; henceforth: SJ), which
was released for Nintendo DS in the United States in 2010, one year
after its initial Japanese release. All aforementioned dialogues and
descriptions of actions are courtesy of developer and publisher Atlus;
all thoughts and emotions described in the excerpt, however, are my
own. It was my heart that was throbbing, only to realise that it was
hypocrite of me to think that I was any better than the character on
the screen. After all, it was me who had been fusing demons to give
birth to stronger species to overcome my character’s weaknesses for
at least thirty hours so far. It is precisely this total immersion, or
presence, in a diegetic reality, rather than merely observing one
without actively taking part, that makes video games so compelling
(McMahan, 2003: 68-9). In order to achieve total immersion, the
player has to transcend the barriers of engagement, investment and
engrossment, and ultimately those of empathy and atmosphere
(Brown and Cairns, 2004).
Rather than focusing on how total immersion can be achieved
design-wise, this thesis is concerned with the interactions between
the human, the nonhuman and the machine within the diegetic
reality of video games. Blending the distinctions between each
subject of the aforementioned trinity – resulting in what literary
critics would call a ‘monster’1 – this paper has to draw from various
disciplines in order to comprehend this ‘monster’, including several
media studies, science fiction (henceforth: sf) studies, 2 philosophy
and to some extent ecology. Ultimately, however, this theoretical
‘monster’ proves to be a useful argument or tool to not only rethink
power relations among human races, but also, as this thesis is
focused on, to challenge established ideas within the field of sf
studies.
Guided by the Derridean notion of the ‘monster’, this thesis
attempts to produce ‚a discursive monster *in the first two sections+
so that the analysis [in the third section] will be a practical effect, so
that people [i.e., in this case, the reader] will be forced to become
aware of the history of normality‛ (1995: 386). Among the many

Literary critics’ thoughts on monstrosities and similar concepts will be discussed in
more detail in subsection ‘The monstrosity, the cyborg and the hybrid’, p. 16.
2 In this thesis the abbreviation ‘sf’ is also used to encompass both ‘science fiction’ and
‘speculative fiction’.
1

2

issues posed by this thesis, the foremost question this thesis is
centred around, then, is as follows:

How does the discursive ‘monster’ constructed throughout this thesis force
its reader to become aware of the history of normality?

To answer this question, this thesis is divided into three sections,
each seeking answers to questions related to the ‘monster’. The first
section serves as an accessible vehicle to introduce the ‘monster’,
both literally and figuratively. By drawing from the recent interest in
animal studies among animation scholars, the central questions focus
on the manifestation or composition of the ‘monster’: how this
‘monster’ relates to nonhuman animals (henceforth: animals), how
thinkers have formulated their ideas on monsters and how one
should understand, or start to understand the ‘monster’ central to
this thesis. To provide an accessible entrance to understanding the
‘monster’, the first section introduces the blurring distinctions
between humans and animals in Paul Wells and Thomas Lamarre’s
discussions on animals, animality and anthropomorphism in
animation – largely inspired by Haraway’s cyborg theory and
Latour’s attempt to rethink modernity, challenging the traditional
anthropocentric

subject-object

distinction.

Moving

from

the

disciplines of animation studies and animal studies, the second
section is concerned with the interaction between individual
elements of the ‘monster’. Fear for the familiar yet foreign, on the one
hand, reminds us of Sigmund Freud’s interpretation of the unheimlich,
or ‘uncanny’; affection for the exotic yet unknown, on the other hand,
may be readily associated with techno-intimacy – especially in this
thesis’ context of media studies – and studies on human-machine
relations by, among others, Anne Allison. Relations, ‚the one true
universal‛ according to Donna Haraway (cited in LaBare, 2010: 106),
provide insight to questions regarding the composition of this thesis’
‘monster’: what do the human, nonhuman and machine mean to one
another, and how does the ‘monster’ challenge the traditional

3

subject-object distinction? If the first two sections search for answers
regarding the manifestation or composition and the individual
interacting elements of the ‘monster’, respectively, the third section
employs the ‘monster’ in a debate to challenge established and
prevalent ideas about utopia, primarily Jameson’s work within the
field of sf studies. As a composition of multiple species, the ‘monster’
is an attempt to justify the theoretical existence of a utopia – or at
least an endeavour to call attention to the anthropocentric thinking in
a field that is often concerned with species other than human.
The research subject from which this ‘monster’ has been derived
is the video game SJ. This paper specifically deals with a Japanese
role-playing game because of the following three reasons: First, the
range of console role-playing games is simply too vast to take
entirely into consideration.3 However, rather than making a general
claim about Japanese role-playing games, the aim of this research is
to consider and reconsider philosophical issues through video games.
Second, as the thesis is concerned with the ambiguous nature of
relationships between human and nonhuman, Japan’s native religion
Shinto (‘the way of the gods’), 4 in which every object may embody a
kami (‘deity’), 5 might prove relevant for this thesis, if not a follow-up
research. Third, other case studies with meaningful interactions
between humans and nonhumans, used to support the thesis’
primary case study, are similarly developed by a Japan based
company. Although this demarcation of focus toward a Japanese
For more insight in the role of monsters and other nonhuman creatures in primarily
Western developed video games, see Fred Botting’s excellent analysis of Doom in
Limits of Horror (1993: 78-88).
4 Despite being a primitive religious thought, Shinto managed to ‘survive’ the
introduction of Buddhism in the sixth century in Japan. One reason for this survival is
the complementary nature of both religious thoughts: whereas Shinto is concerned
with life, vitality and associated with birth and marriage, Buddhism focuses on the
suffering of human life and practised through funerals. Hence, most Japanese have
ever since considered themselves both Shintoist and Buddhist (Varley, 2000: 19-47).
5 Often translated as ‘god’ or ‘deity’, the word kami does not hold the connotation of
‘transcendent’ – unlike the former – but one along the lines of ‘upper’ or ‘above’
(Varley, 2000: 9). To follow the definition provided by Motoori Norinaga (1730-1801),
one of the most prestigious nationalistic scholars of the Tokugawa period: ‚The word
kami refers, in the most general sense, to all divine beings of heaven and earth that
appear in the classics. More particularly, the kami are the spirits that abide in and are
worshipped at shrines. In principle, human beings, birds, animals, trees, plants,
mountains, oceans – all may be kami. According to ancient usage, whatever seemed
strikingly impressive, possessed the quality of excellence , or inspired a feelings of awe
was called kami‛ (cited in ibidem: 9).
3

4

role-playing game may be considered as an approach bordering on
Saidian Orientalism, 6 it should be noted that such a limitation is
required, on the one hand, to refrain from endless historisation and
contextualisation, and, on the other, to provide the necessary firm
soil to build on, especially with a ‘monster’ that is not only composed
of multiple species, but also theoretically composed of multiple
disciplines.

Said’s self-proclaimed ‚most readily accepted designation for Orientalism is an
academic one. (<) Anyone who teaches, writes about, or researches the Orient–and
this applies whether the person is an anthropologist, sociologist, historian, or
philologist–either in its specific or its general aspects, is an Orientalist, and what he or
she says or does is Orientalism‛ (Said, 1995: 2).
6

5

What is this ‘monster’?

‚Monsters cannot be announced. One cannot say: ‘here are our
monsters’, without immediately turning the monsters into pets.‛
- Jacques Derrida (1989: 170)

Building without firm soil is impossible. Therefore, in order to
construct a method that allows us to start understanding the
manifestation or composition of the ‘monster’ central to this thesis, I
will draw from two recent studies in the field of animation
scholarship, wherein an interest in animality (and somewhat less
recent, anthropomorphism) in animation has developed. By means of
a literary review, I will discuss Paul Wells’ most recent work, The
Animated Bestiary: Animals, Cartoons, and Culture (2009), and Thomas
Lamarre’s articles on speciesism published in three editions of the
journal Mechademia. Especially the latter’s ideas on interaction
between multiple speciesism is crucial for understanding the
composition of this thesis’ ‘monster’, which will serve as the
cornerstone for the discussion that follows.

Animated animals and anthropomorphism
In his impressive monograph, Paul Wells calls attention to a critical
engagement with the phenomenon of animated animals in the
history of animation. Throughout five chapters, he provides both a
theoretical and a pragmatic oriented toolbox for the reader to rethink
animality in animation whilst highlighting more specific topics, such
as his identification of four archetypes of metamorphosis of animals
(2009: 149-174). In his chapter on the employment of animals as
6

embodiments of meaning, challenging prevalent clichés and
connotations, he turns to the presence, or absence, of relations
between human and animals in certain animation films. The
discussion on the risks of anthropomorphism in relation to humans
is led by animation teacher Ed Hooks’ argument that ‚*i+nter-species
communication is a fascinating challenge for animation‛ (cited in
Wells, 2009: 120-1), arguing that there are numerous examples of
animation films that limit the interaction of nonhuman animals to
other nonhuman animals. A similar point was made by Japanese
auteur Osamu Tezuka, who felt that ‚if forest animals in Bambi had
been as self-aware and mutually social as they were depicted, they
would not have remained so fearful and remote from man‛ (Patten
cited in Wells, 2009: 121). This observation by Tezuka in regards
might have been a crucial observation in developing his manga
Jangaru Taitei (‘The Jungle Emperor’, 1950-1954), or Kimba, the White
Lion in the West, in which the animals from an African animal
kingdom, led by Kimba, engage with humans and try to make them
acknowledge themselves as social equals.7
This interaction between multiple species, what Hooks described
as ‘inter-species communication’, constitutes the foundation of
Thomas Lamarre’s article on the ‘multispecies ideal’ (2010), largely
based on the work of Tezuka. Following the Japanese literary trope
of opting for a party-based group dynamic over a singular hero – as
has been a prevalent literary trope in early Japanese epic novels and
recurrent in modern digital games8 – Lamarre associates Haraway’s
notion that the cyborg9 is a subspecies of companion species10 with

Ironically, while Tezuka’s argument was the result of his observations of Western
animation films, Disney does not only lack acknowledging The Jungle Emperor as a
source of inspiration for The Lion King, despite the many similarities (Wells, 2009: 122),
it also ignores the inter-species communication that was one of the cornerstones for
The Jungle Emperor according to Tezuka.
8 This association has also been made by Kieran Blasingim, who draws parallels
between the Japanese epic novel Nansō Satomi Hakkenden (1814-1842, ‘The Eight
Dogs Chronicles’) and several popular Japanese video game series, such as Final
Fantasy (Blasingim, 2006: 32-41).
9 Haraway defines her concept of the cyborg as ‚cybernetic organism‛, ‚a hybrid of
machine and organism‛, ‚a creature of lived social reality‛ and ‚creature of fiction‛
(1991). Haraway employs the cyborg as a discursive monster to rethink socialistfeminism ‚postmodernist, non-naturalist mode and in the utopian tradition of
7

7

several (early) post-war works. One such example is director Seo
Mitsuyo’s take on the folklore Momotarō with his manga film
Momotarō, umi no shinpei (‘Momotarō’s Divine Navy’, 1945), starring
the young eponymous hero who, supported by a group of ‘Japanese
animals’,11 receives cooperation from the indigenous animals of the
southern sea island he just arrived on. As mentioned before,
Tezuka’s manga Jangaru Taitei follows this same principle of ‘interspecies communication’ and ‘multispecies ideal’, which Lamarre
then describes as ‚striv*ing+ to imagine the interaction of species
beyond the logic of social Darwinism‛ (Lamarre, 2010: 59), i.e. the
social policy of survival of the fittest. Jangaru Taitei’s protagonist Leo
is not merely king of the lions, but emperor of a ‚multispecies
cooperative (<)‛, with the manga ‚offer[ing] images of different
species engaging in playful rivalry or harmonious cooperation
reminiscent of the jungle scenes in Momotarō, umi no shinpei‛ (ibidem).
Multispeciesism, as the term implies, is derived from – and an
expansion of – ‘speciesism’, a term coined by Lamarre in the first part
of his work on animals in animation. Similar to his challenging
monograph The Anime Machine (2009), in which he introduces terms
such as ‘cinematism’ and ‘animetism’,12 he starts off this tripartite on
speciesism by formulating his latest philosophical thoughts. Building
on John Dower’s War Without Mercy (1986), Lamarre draws from
Dower’s description of persistence of racial consciousness and racial
typology, whenever human animals are depicted as nonhuman
animals, as the principle of speciesism. In other words, ‚speciesism is
a displacement of race and racism (relations between humans as
imagining a world without gender, which is perhaps a world without genesis, but
maybe also a world without end‛ (ibidem: 151).
10 Lamarre refers to Haraway’s provocative thesis ‚I have come to see cyborgs as
junior siblings in the much bigger, queer family of companion species‛ (Haraway,
2003a: 63).
11 Here, ‘Japanese animals’ does not imply that these animals are unique to Japan, but
it serves to indicate a difference with the indigenous animals Momotarō and his
animal friends run into. Following the conventional traditions of the folklore,
Momotarō’s party comprises a dog, monkey and pheasant – to which Tezuka added a
rabbit (Lamarre, 2010: 57), possibly derived from another folklore, Inaba no Shirousagi
(‘The Hare of Inaba’).
12 Whereas in ‘cinematism’, referring to Paul Virilio’s thoughts, the movement of
perspective is the result of a moving camera (such as with live-action films), in
‘animetism’ movement is the result of sliding layers within an image and recorded by
a fixed camera (such as with animation productions) (Lamarre, 2009: 6).

8

imagined in racial terms) onto relations between humans and
animals‛ (Lamarre, 2008: 76). In the discussion on the role of
dehumanisation of races in Japanese animation (rather than, and in
contrast to, American bestialisation) through various pre-war
animation films, Lamarre argues that these early works of speciesism
could be read allegorically with animals representing a particular
nation. Towards the end of the first part, Lamarre questions whether
speciesism is fated to displace racism (to erase, reinscribe, and renew
it), or whether it can produce ‚something new, something beyond
racial thought?‛ (ibidem: 90).
He offers his view on this issue in the second part, focusing on the
works of manga artist Osamu Tezuka within the ‘paradigm’ of sengo
(‘post-war’) to understand Japanese history, which generally means
encouraging the belief that history could begin anew, and that
modernity had gone wrong in Japan, but could be righted (Lamarre,
2010: 54). Unlike pre-war speciesism, Lamarre argues, this paradigm
marks a shift towards ‘multispeciesism’, similar to multiculturalism
and a product of Japan’s vision of a multi-ethnic empire. The
aforementioned imagination by Tezuka in striving to ‚imagine the
interaction of species beyond the logic of social Darwinism‛ (ibidem:
59) ultimately proves to be unmaintainable. In questioning the
operative logic of ‘species differences’ (a set of seemingly irreducible
and insurmountable biological differences), Lamarre postulates that
‚speciesism feels like an exceedingly inflexible form of racialism‛
(ibidem: 70), since biological racialism is portrayed as natural (his
italics), which on the one hand is little more than a continuation of
modern racialism. On the other hand, however, in criticising officials’
acceptance of racialism in the post-war period, such as the UNESCO
Race Question of 1950, Lamarre argues that ‚the appeal of speciesism
lies in the challenge that is posed both to reactionary racism and to
progressive antiracism, by staging an encounter between the human
and the nonhuman‛ (ibidem: 71-2). Concluding that ‚speciesism has
expanded beyond its initial emphasis on racial difference to embrace
all manner of cultural difference‛ (ibidem: 76), he continues to

9

discuss contemporary understandings of representation theory and
national allegory.
While this paper is not concerned with the translation of racialism
to nonhuman characters in video games (rather than comics and
animation in the case of Lamarre), speciesism and multispeciesism
will serve as an essential method, or tool, in understanding the
components that together form the ‘monster’ of this thesis. Indeed, if
we regard the discussion on speciesism hitherto as a tool to
understand the ‘monster’, then – in line with the analogy – the
following introductory subsection to the thesis’ primary case study
serves as ammunition to support this tool in its struggle to render the
‘monster’ comprehensible.

10

Figure 1: Nakajima overlooking the sexual intercourse between his
teacher Ohara in the physical world and the demon Loki in the
virtual world ( Nishikubo, 2001).

Contextualising Shin Megami Tensei
Without drawing too much attention to the term ‘intermediality’13
and its wide range of definitions, it should be noted that the Shin
Megami Tensei series is – like many, if not most popular Japanese
works (e.g. an animated adaptation of a manga)14 – not a medium

Robin Nelson considers the traditional definition of intermediality as ‚a bridge
between mediums‛ (2010: 14) obsolete and prefers Klaus Bruhn Jensen more up-todate definition: ‚Intermediality refers to the interconnectedness of modern media of
communication. As means of expression and exchange, the different media depend on
and refer to each other, both explicitly and implicitly; they interact as elements of
particular communicative strategies; and they are constituents of a wider cultural
environment‛ (ibidem: 14-5).
14 For example, the most popular Shin Megami Tensei game, the fourth instalment of the
Persona subseries, Shin Megami Tensei: Persona 4 (Atlus, 2009), has spawned numerous
derivative ‘narrative works’, including several manga series; a 26 episode anime
adaptation, which was later re-released as a 90 minute feature film; an adjusted and
expanded version (‘remake’ or ‘port’) of the game for another game console; a fighting
game based on the original game’s setting; multiple live stage productions; a detective
novel based on one of the character’s post-game adventures; and even, despite not
officially supported by Persona 4 developer/publisher Atlus, a pornographic parody
film (cf. Azuma, 2009: 58 ff.)
13

11

specific production. Although its popularity flourished as a video
game series, the Shin Megami Tensei series originated as a trilogy of
Japanese cyberpunk novels, Digital Devil Story: Megami Tensei (1986)
by by Aya Nishitani, describing the revenge of gifted high school
student Nakajima on his bullies by summoning the deity Loki 15
through a self-written computer program. One week after the
program’s initial execution, Loki executes the bullies by controlling
Nakajima’s fellow students’ bodies. Loki, however, demands female
sacrifices in return. Impregnating Nakajima’s beautiful teacher Ohara
(through a helmet that connects her body to the cyberspace in which
Loki resides) does not suffice (figure 1), however, whereupon Loki
materialises himself into Nakajima’s world to horribly molest his
friend Yumiko. Nakajima rapidly summons the beast Kerberos, 16
which attacks Loki and allows Nakajima to escape to Asuka, 17 where
he plans to resurrect Yumiko. There it becomes apparent that
Yumiko is a reincarnation of Izanami (hence the story’s subtitle), the
Japanese kami of creation and death, 18 whose powers provide
Nakajima with sufficient time to summon Hinokagutsuchi 19 as a
sword to vanquish Loki from reality.
This brief summary of Digital Devil Story already provides vivid
descriptions of various manners of interaction between human and
Loki is a god or a jotun (‘giant’, race opposite of gods) from Norse mythology, who
is generally depicted as a rebellious and malicious trickster, responsible for the death
of Odin’s son Balder and the destruction of the world, or Ragnarök (Lurker, 2004: 113).
16 Kerberos, also rendered as Cerberus in the Megami Tensei and Shin Megami Tensei
video games, is the Greek hound of hell, guarding the gates of the Underworld
according to Greek and Roman mythology. Unlike its popular depiction with multiple
heads, it is portrayed as a white lion with a snake-like tail coming out of its back in the
Megami Tensei series.
17 The precise location where Nakajima resurrects Yumiko is the Ishibutai crypt, one of
Japan’s largest monolithic structures and is believed to be the tomb of Soga-no-Umako
(‚Ishibutai Kofun‛, 1995).
18 Together with her husband and brother Izanagi, Izanami forms Japan’s primeval
deities, who created the land and conceived other kami. Hinokagutsuchi’s birth
became Izanami’s death (q.v. note 199) and she was casted away to yomi
(‘underworld’). Despite Izanagi’s efforts to save her, she had already eaten food from
yomi and was thus unable to return. Upon seeing her true form, rotten and covered
with maggots, Izanagi fled while Izanami tried to stop him. After Izanagi managed to
flee, Izanami proclaimed that she would destroy 1000 lives each day, to which he
replied that he would conceive 1500. Therefore, Izanami is associated with both
creation (while being alive) and death (while residing in yomi).
19 Hinokagutsuchi was a Japanese kami of fire, whose fire burnt his mother Izanami to
death during his birth. In a rage of grief, his father Izanagi decapitated him and his
remains formed new kami. According to Michael Ashkenazi, the ‚birth of fire marked
the end of the creation of the world and the start of death‛ (2003: 186).
15

12

nonhuman characters. These human-nonhuman relations appear to
be hostile, in the case of Nakajima and Yumiko versus Loki;
cooperative, such as Kerberos’ attitude towards Nakajima; desirable,
as Ohara becomes jealous when Loki rapes Yumiko; and
transcendental, with Yumiko reincarnating as Izanami. Unlike the
video game series it spawned, the novel trilogy and subsequent
animation adaptation offer linear narratives. In other words, all the
human-nonhuman

relations

in

the

Digital

Devil

Story

are

predetermined by its author and cannot be altered or influenced by
its reader or spectator. Following this logic, I would like to briefly
introduce the video game series it spawned before moving on to a
more theoretical discussion on human-nonhuman relations in video
games, especially the Shin Megami Tensei series, in the following
section.
The video game series emerged with two Megami Tensei games
developed by Namcot20 in 1987 and 1989, after which the rights of the
series were acquired – for reasons still unknown – by the Japanese
video games firm Atlus. Paying little heed to the narrative
foundation of the novel trilogy, Atlus made numerous additions
while leaving the core principles of the games untouched, turning
Shin Megami Tensei (Atlus, 1992) 21 into an underground cult-hit in
Japan (Kalata and Snelgrove, n.d.). Set in a post-apocalyptic Japan
during the last decade of the twentieth century, 22 Shin Megami Tensei
revolves around a charismatic leader working toward a coup d’état
by summoning and exploiting demons from the underworld. After
receiving an email that contains the Devil Summoning Program, the
story’s nameless hero, the player’s avatar, is able to communicate
with, fight against or recruit demons he encounters. Ultimately, his
Namcot is a brand established by arcade manufacturer Namco (now fused with
Bandai) in the 1980’s to develop and publish video games for home consoles. Halfway
the 1990’s it was merged with the Namco brand.
21 ‘Shin’ in Shin Megami Tensei is susceptible to multiple interpretations: first, the
character used to write ‘shin’ (真, ‘truth’) may have been added by Atlus to distinguish
their games from the Namcot developed games; second, Shin Megami Tensei’s ‘shin’ is
phonetically equivalent to ‘shin’( 新 , ‘new’), phonetically suggesting a degree of
improvement over the Megami Tensei series; and third, it follows the video game
naming convention of games that were developed for Nintendo’s Super Famicom
(SNES in the West), by adding ‘shin’ (or ‘Super’) prior to the game’s title.
22 The post-apocalyptic setting of the Shin Megami Tensei video games build on
20

13

choices throughout the game determine the future of Japan through
siding either with God and his angels (for absolute order), or with
Lucifer and his demons (for total freedom), or siding with neither to
realise his own vision of society. 23
Following its moderate success, especially in comparison to
blockbuster-esque role-playing series such as Dragon Quest and Final
Fantasy, it spawned main series sequels for Super Famicom (Shin
Megami Tensei II, 1994), one for PlayStation 2 (Shin Megami Tensei III:
Lucifer’s Call, 2003) and one for Nintendo DS (Shin Megami Tensei:
Strange Journey, 2010), of which the latter serves as this paper’s
primary case study and will be discussed in greater detail in the
following section. While the main series follow the novel’s
conventions of a human protagonist fighting alongside and versus
demons, Atlus also developed several subseries, which slightly
deviate from the main series’ core principle. For example, the Digital
Devil Saga series enables its post-human protagonists to transform
into demons24 and in the Persona series the demons are portrayed as
manifestations of the characters’ inner feelings. 25 Other subseries,
such as the Devil Survivor and Devil Summoner Raidou Kuzunoha
(which in itself is a subseries of another subseries) series, replace the
traditional turn-based game mechanic with a strategy-based and
action-based system, respectively.
What makes the Shin Megami Tensei games more relevant for this
paper than other Japanese role-playing games, is that it offers the
player a blank slate (within the limitations of formalised systems
within games), where choices will influence the outcome of the
apocalyptic invasion of demons and thus the future of Tokyo or the

Shin Megami Tensei creative director Kazuma Kaneko describes the influences of
these choices as follows: ‚It's not wrong to put everything into simple ‚good‛ and
‚evil‛, like in other games, but what's right and wrong can be completely different,
depending on your position and perspective; it's very ambiguous. So I say, why not let
each player tackle that question of what's right and wrong?‛ (Moore, 2010: 1).
24 See Kieran G. Blasingim (2006) for an analysis of similarities between the Digital
Devil Saga series, among others, and traditional Japanese heroic tales.
25 Elsewhere, I have argued that the fourth Persona video game explicitly offers a clash
between understandings of traditional and modern Japan, encouraging players to
rethink prevalent concepts of identity in light of their respective Zeitgeist (Van Zoggel,
2011a).
23

14

planet as a whole.26 In this sense, Shin Megami Tensei’s gameplay is
heavily dependent upon two concepts I have highlighted in the
discussion on Wells’ and Lamarre’s work: ‘inter-species communication’ and ‘multispecies cooperative’. Like the lion Leo in Tezuka’s
Jangaru Taitei¸ the player controlled main character is able to engage
in ‘inter-species communication’ with the demons, soon leading to a
‘multispecies cooperative’ to reconstruct the world according to the
player’s choices.
The role of these choices is best evident in Shin Megami Tensei III:
Lucifer’s Call (henceforth: LC). The outcome of the world’s rebirth is
determined by the ‘Reason’ the player decides to side with.27 In the
temporal post-apocalyptic world in which LC takes place, however,
Reasons constitute the world’s natural laws and its habitants,
primarily demons, and operate according to the game’s rendering of
post-apocalyptic Tokyo. Demons, including the half-demonic main
character, are unable to establish their own Reason and are thus
encouraged to follow one of the existing Reasons. Yet, the player can
also reject these Reasons and follow his own path by staying neutral,
with the world eventually returning to its previous, pre-apocalypse
state; siding with Lucifer, postponing the Earth’s rebirth; or even
triumphing over Lucifer, leading to the collapse of the game’s
universe through the destruction of time and a battle between the
main character, supported by Lucifer, and the ‘The Great Will’,
arguably referring to Lucifer’s archrival in the Shin Megami Tensei
series, YHVH (Yehowah).

The apocalyptic or post-apocalyptic setting of Shin Megami Tensei video games serve
as the backdrop to think about questions, such as ‚what's at the end of the universe? Is
there an end?‛. Creative director Kazuma Kaneko thinks that ‚most people have asked
this sort of question at some point in their life. Personally, I just love thinking about
things like that. Even though humans are part of the universe, nobody knows why the
universe exists, or how humans came into being. A philosophical approach is the only
way we can reach some kind of conclusion. That's exactly what myths arephilosophical explanations of the universe and man-and why I love myths so much‛
(Moore, 2010: 1).
27 The ‘Reasons’ in LC are inner philosophies reflecting the ideologies of the humans
destined to survive the Conception. These Reasons are roughly equivalent to:
Buddhism inspired existential nihilism (named Shijima, ‚All at one with the world‛);
isolated individualism (Musubi, ‚I am the center of the world‛); and social Darwinism
(Yosuga, ‚The world only needs beautiful things‛).
26

15

The monstrosity, the cyborg and the hybrid
At this point, it should be evident that the demons in the Shin
Megami Tensei games fulfil a crucial role in the process of initiating,
shaping and challenging the future of each game’s diegetic reality. In
the case of LC, the human Reason leaders accumulate demon
followers to conquer the other Reasons and determine the future of
the universe. This perspective on the nonhuman, however, is not
unique to the series’ creative director Kazuma and his team; rather, it
corresponds with the ideas on monsters, their horrifying appearances,
the degradation of what is considered sacred and their role within
society of many twentieth century thinkers.
As gods degraded from the divine position and sacred domain,
the nonhumans in SJ readily reminds us of Russian philosopher
Mikhail Bakhtin’s concept of ‘grotesque realism’, which he explored
in his dissertation Rabelais and his World (1984).28 Through Gargantua
and Pantagruel, a series of five novels by French author François
Rabelais (1494-1553), Bakhtin understood ‘grotesque realism’ as
‚degradation, that is, the lowering of all that is high, spiritual, ideal,
abstract; it is a transfer to the material level, to the sphere of earth
and body in their indissoluble unity‛ (Bakhtin, 1984: 19-20).
Degradation was ‚downward‛, i.e. ‚the fruitful earth‛ (in contrast to
heaven) and ‚the genital organs, the belly, and the buttocks‛ (in
contrast to the face and head) (ibidem: 21).29 Bakhtin’s description of
the ‘grotesque image’ – ‚reflect*ing+ a phenomenon in transformation,
an as yet unfinished metamorphosis, of death and birth, growth and

Despite submitted in 1940, the defence of Bakhtin’s dissertation was postponed after
World War II. The dissertation had many scholarly opponents, which led to meetings
until the government intervened and denied his doctorate. Rabelais and his World was
not published before 1965, nineteen years after Bakhtin’s initial defence (Holquist,
1982: xxv).
29 Particular designs demons, or nonhumans, in Shin Megami Tensei challenge Bakhtin’s
distinction between ‚upward‛ and ‚downward‛. For example, the demon Diana –
symbol for female fertility – is portrayed as an entity a human archer, yet the top of
her head (‚upward‛) features multiple female breasts (‚downward‛), as if it were a
headdress. Her shoulders, hips, knees and ankles are similarly covered with female
breasts. This, perhaps, is designer Kazuma Kaneko’s interpretation of the ‚exaggerated‛ nature of the grotesque body (Bakhtin, 1984: 19) and bodily reversal of
degradation.
28

16

becoming‛ (ibidem: 24) – is ambivalent, 30 contradictory and, of
course, monstrous from ‚the point of view of ‚classic‛ aesthetics,
that is, the aesthetics of the ready­made and the completed‛ ibidem:
25). Here, Bakhtin highlights ‘grotesque realism’ as a literary mode to
break with what is considered the norm – something this subsection
will return to while discussing Foucault and Derrida – on, among
others, the aesthetic level and the political level.
In his celebrated work Les Mots et les choses: Une archéologie des
sciences humaines (‘The Order of Things: An Archaeology of the
Human Sciences’, 1966), Michel Foucault offers a literary excavation
of human sciences by developing and demonstrating his concept of
the ‘episteme’, an apparatus of understanding which shapes the
knowledge of a particular epoch.31 In the fifth chapter, dealing with
the classification of things, Foucault discusses (the role of) the
importance of the monster and the fossil in relation to taxonomies.
He argues that ‚the monster and the fossil are merely the backward
projection of those differences and those identities that provide
taxinomia first with structure, then with character‛ (Foucault, 2005:
171), stressing the importance of defining the boundaries of what is
considered the norm. He then further emphasise the differentiating
role of the monster and mark of origin of the fossil by concluding
that ‚the monster provides an account, as though in caricature, of the
genesis of differences, and the fossil recalls, in the uncertainty of its
resemblances, the first buddings of identity‛ (ibidem).
Foucault’s perspective on the monster as a concept to define, or
break with, normality is similar to that of his contemporary Derrida.
In an interview with Derrida in Points…: Interview, 1974-1994 (1995),
he is asked by interviewer Elisabeth Weber to clarify the relation
‚between what *Derrida calls+ the monsters of *his+ writing and the
Ambivalence is not just an ‚indispensible trait‛ (Bakhtin, 1984: 24) for the ‘grotesque
image’, it is also a trait of Bakhtin’s descriptions of the grotesque as a method,
31 Foucault later defined ‘episteme’ as follows: ‚I would define the episteme retrospectively as the strategic apparatus which permits of separating out from among all the
statements which are possible those that will be acceptable within, I won’t say a
scientific theory, but a field of scientificity, and which it is possible to say are true or
false. The episteme is the ‘apparatus’ which makes possible the separation, not of the
true from the false, but of what may from what may not be characterized as scientific‛
(1980: 197).
30

17

memory of this absence of power‛ (Derrida, 1995: 385). Emphasising
the difficulty to grasp this relation, Derrida starts by describing his
understanding of a monster as a hybridisation or composition of
heterogeneous organisms. Such monstrosity, as a pragmatic tool,
reveals what is considered normality:
Faced with a monster, one may become aware of what the norm is and when
this norm has a history–which is the case with discursive norms,
philosophical norms, socio-cultural norms, they have a history–any
appearance of monstrosity in this domain allows an analysis of the history of
the norms. (ibidem: 385-6)

Similar to Derrida’s argument that monstrosity can be considered as
a tool to analyse the history of norms, LC employs the sudden
apocalypse and invasion of humans to force the player ‚to become
aware of the history of normality‛ prior to the apocalypse (ibidem:
386). The player has to take the strengths and weaknesses of the
universe prior to the apocalypse into consideration and advance his
engagement with the monstrosity, the demons, accordingly.
Derrida also remarks that the ‚monster is a species for which we
do not yet have a name‛ (ibidem), yet it remains a composition of
species, or fragments thereof, already known to mankind. One
example to illustrate Derrida’s point would be the Chímaira (Greek
for ‘goat’) from Greek mythologies, which was said to have ‚a lion’s
forequarters, the body is that of a goat (with a goat’s head) and the
tail is replaced by a snake‛ (Lurker, 2004: 43). Despite being a
composition of familiar species, as apparent from Lurker’s
description of the Chímaira, Derrida contends that the monster is
frightening ‚precisely because no anticipation had prepared one to
identify this figure‛ (Derrida, 1995: 386.). This unpreparedness is a
recurring gameplay mechanic in SJ, as ‘new’ (that is, previously
unidentified) demons are represented by an animated graphical icon
by the main character’s ‘Demonica’,32 a highly advanced battle suit.
The paper will return to SJ in greater detail in the following section.
Demonica stands for ‚Demountable Next Integrated Capability Armor‛, and
functions similar to the COMP devices used in other Megami Tensei products,
including the Digital Devil Monogatari novels (Nishitani, 1986).
32

18

These unidentifiable and thus terrifying attributes of the monster
are of fundamental importance to the concept of the monster, since,
as Derrida points out, as soon as the monster is acknowledged as a
monster, it is being domesticated. In other words, derived from
another writing: ‚Monsters cannot be announced. One cannot say:
‘here are our monsters’, without immediately turning the monsters
into pets‛ (Derrida, 1989: 80). It should be noted that, as Derrida
himself argues, his concept of the monster is not limited to
organisms; it can similarly be associated with abstract ideas, such as
the future:
The future is necessarily monstrous: the figure of the future, that is, that
which can only be surprising, that for which we are not prepared, you see, is
heralded by species of monsters. A future that would not be monstrous
would not be a future; it would already be a predictable, calculable, and
programmable tomorrow. All experience open to the future is prepared or
prepares itself to welcome the monstrous arrivant... (Derrida, 1995: 386-7)

This process of domesticating a monster, forcing us to change our
habits and thus norms, is what Derrida calls ‚the movement of
culture‛ (ibidem). These monstrosities – the manifestations of the
unacceptable, or intolerable, of the incomprehensible – produce
events in histories (ibidem, his italics) and force us to rethink our
norms and history thereof.
While Derrida optimistically posits his understanding of the
monster as a pragmatic tool to move culture and its norms, one
should not forget that the monster still has the quality of the uncanny,
to which this paper returns in the following section. As Colin
Milburn reminds us in his article on Darwin and Derrida’s
perspectives on the monster, that, despite both thinkers celebrate the
monster’s arrivant to violate the order of things, ‚[h]orror is a
weapon, and while sometimes it may be used for affirmative
purposes, such as the implantation of a deconstructive or an
evolutionary discourse, there exist horrors and monstrosities that can
never be accepted‛ (2003: 621).

19

To put the aforementioned conceptualisations of the monster in
perspective, this section will conclude with Bruno Latour’s
reconsideration of modernity and Donna Haraway’s work on the
cyborg, which Joshua LaBare associated with sf’s obsession with
‘things’ (LaBare, 2010: 79-81). While connecting the contrasting
definitions of a ‘thing’ – ‘an inanimate material object’ on the one
hand, and ‘an action, activity, concept or thought’ on the other – to
Haraway’s provocative thesis 33 on the cyborg is fairly straightforward; much more intriguing, however, is the association with
Latour’s attempt to rethink modernity. In discussing the hypothesis
of his book We Have Never Been Modern (1993), Latour briefly
describes that
The hypothesis of this essay is that the word ‚modern‛ designates two sets
of entirely different practices which must remain distinct if they are to
remain effective, but have recently begun to be confused. The first set of
practices, by ‚translation‛, creates mixtures between entirely new types of
beings, hybrids of nature and culture. The second, by ‚purification‛, creates
two entirely distinct ontological zones: that of human beings on the one
hand; that of nonhumans on the other. Without the first set, the practices of
purification would be fruitless or pointless. Without the second, the work of
translation would be slowed down, limited, or even ruled out (Latour, 1993:
10-11).

In other words, Latour’s ‘modernity’ is a dichotomy of the domain of
the subject (e.g. ‚human‛, ‚society‛, ‚politics‛, and ‚mind‛) on the
one hand, and the domain of the object (‚nature‛, ‚world‛, ‚science‛,
and ‚nonhuman‛, etc.) on the other – the very existence and
recurrent

formation

of

hybrids

(‚networks‛,

‚mediators‛,

‚collectives‛, etc.) are incompatible with Latour’s modernity.
Hybrids, here, are ‘instable events’ (or ‚imbroglios‛) that just happen
and, despite exhibiting characteristics of subjects and objects, cannot
be understood from the subject-object dichotomy. Only after being
stabilised, these hybrids ‘produce’ subjects and objects – therefore,
Latour renders hybrids as ontologically primary.
The provocative thesis mentioned here as follows: ‚I have come to see cyborgs as
junior siblings in the much bigger, queer family of companion species‛ (Haraway,
2003a: 58-59).
33

20

The observant reader may have noticed similarities between the
thoughts – certainly not method – of Derrida, Haraway and Latour:
these thinkers are concerned with ‚tertium quids‛ (LaBare, 2010: 80), a
literally ‘third something’ that is unknown yet present in
combination

with

two

known

ones.

Derrida’s

monstrosity,

Haraway’s cyborg and Latour’s hybrids are definitely no synonyms,
but point towards the same: that what is unknown will affect – back
to Foucault – the order of things.
Having established this theoretical framework, it might be
relevant to briefly re-examine the discussion on animality and
anthropomorphism in animation by Wells and Lamarre in light of
this framework. Both authors are interested in the playful challenges
posed to the ‘boundaries’ between human and animal, and are thus
constantly emphasising the hybrid nature of their research subject.
Wells, building on his analytical model on bestial ambivalence in the
first chapter (2009: 51 ff.), appears to be more concerned with the
anthropomorphisation of the animal, whereas Lamarre, drawing
from wartime animation, explores the allegorical representations (or
translations) of human races into animated animals (Lamarre, 2009).
By adding these anthropomorphised animals and dehumanised
humans to the set of conceptual tertium quids already discussed in
this subsection, it should be clear how we should start to understand
the ‘monster’ of this thesis: a trinity of the human, the nonhuman and
the machine – challenging the subject-object binary and what is
considered normal by transgressing, and perhaps even trespassing,
the domains of one another. The following section, then, discusses
the correlation between these domains and – finally – gives this
conceptual ‘monster’ flesh through the context of the demon from
Shin Megami Tensei series.

21

How does this ‘monster’ work?

‚Intimate play goods are machines used for play and instruction and also
for communication and companionship. Significantly, these devices are also
said to be ‚healing‛ in rhetoric that assumes players are already wounded:
physically on edge, overworked, stressed out. Being touched by another,
albeit a machine, is soothing: the s(t)imulation of social intercourse.‛
- Anne Allison (2006: 190)

Having discussed the manifestation and composition of the ‘monster’
in the previous section, this section seeks to discuss the complex
system of interaction between individual components of the
‘monster’ in more detail. As the first chapter already discussed the
human-nonhuman relations at length, this chapter will call attention
to the human-machine (and, to some extent, the nonhuman-machine)
interface. In doing so, two concepts are essential in thinking about
these relations. Fear for the familiar yet foreign, on the one hand, will
follow the concept of the uncanny, or the unheimlich.34 Affection for
the exotic yet unknown, on the other, may be readily associated –
especially in this thesis’ disciplinary field of media studies – with the
concepts

of

techno-intimacy

and

intimate

virtuality,

which

anthropologist Anne Allison (2006) has associated with Tamagotchi
and Pokémon, respectively. As stated before, these concepts will be
guided by the Shin Megami Tensei series, in particular SJ, to provide a
solid understanding of the ‘monster’ in the final subsection so that it
can be employed in the debate during the third section.

The German word unheimlich literally means ‘unhomely’, but it translated
throughout this paper as ‘uncanny’ to follow the translating conventions of the
authors whose work will be discussed. It should be noted that unheimlich and uncanny
are no precise equivalents of one another.
34

22

The Uncanny
I was first introduced to the concept of the uncanny in a 2002 article
by Miri Nakamura on Japanese author Yumeno Kyūsaku’s novel
Dogura Magura (1935). As a result of Japan’s self-imposed sakoku
(‘locked country’) policy during the Tokugawa period (1603-1868),35
Japan had long been isolated from the rest of the world and had thus
been affected marginally by foreign influences. Although Japan’s
modernisation, roughly equal to ‘Westernisation’, did set in before
the advent of the twentieth century, Dogura Magura is considered as
one of the few works that deal with a more ‘pure Japanese’ science
fiction than its post-war counterparts.
Nakamura focuses on the role of technology in the pre-war
periods of the Taishō (1912-1926) and early Shōwa (1926-1989),
considered by contemporary thinkers as ‚the age of machines, in
contrast to the people at the turn of the century, who feared
machines‛ (Hirabayashi Hatsunosuke (1930) cited in Nakamura,
2006: 6). Nakamura then provides a detailed account of Japan’s
curiosity regarding machinery and even humanoid technology on
the one hand and the fear among thinkers regarding the influence of
technology on mankind on the other. She is particularly interested in
Dogura Magura since, rather than focusing on physical machinery, it
is concerned with the dystopian potentialities of technology by
‚deploy*ing+ mechanical metaphors to capture the functioning of the
human mind‛ (ibidem: 10).
Instead of summarising Dogura Magura and discussing the usage
of the uncanny as a metaphor, Nakamura’s concept, or rather
conceptualisation of the ‘mechanical uncanny’ is more relevant to
this thesis than the actual novel itself. Although the exact definition
of the mechanical uncanny is dependent on its context and thus
varies throughout the article, its conceptual purpose remains
This sakoku policy was an initiative of the Tokugawa shogunate, established in 1600,
to preserve its national hegemony and prevent the influence of Christianity by
terminating a ‚lively century of intercourse with the countries of western Europe‛
(Varley, 2000: 164). Only the Dutch were allowed to continue their trade with Japan,
even though their presence in Japan was limited to the artificial island Deshima in the
harbour of Nagasaki. See Varley (2000: 164 ff.) for an accessible yet profound account
on relations between Tokugawa Japan and the Western world.
35

23

constant. To describe a few, the mechanical uncanny is perceived as a
‚literary mode that blurs the line between what is perceived as
natural and what is perceived as artiﬁcial‛ (ibidem: 5),36 ‚a mode of
fear that captures the invasion of the mechanical into the biological‛
(ibidem: 9), and ‚marked by a certain loss of both individual and
national identity and a certain nostalgia for a pre-Westernized Japan‛
(ibidem: 11).37 Although Nakamura concludes her article by arguing
that the mechanical uncanny in Dogura Magura is at work on two
levels, namely on the level of the individual and on the level of
national consciousness, I argue that it is also at work on the level of
the discourse, since – to cite Nakamura herself – ‚mechanical
metaphors to capture the functioning of the human mind‛ (ibidem:
10) are deployed throughout Dogura Magura.
Nakamura’s conceptualisation of the mechanical uncanny is
obviously, as she indicates herself, one of many interpretations and
repurposes of the uncanny as it was coined by Ernst Jentsch in his
1906 essay Zur Psychologie des Unheimlichen (‘On the Psychology of
the Uncanny’) and later popularised through Sigmund Freud’s 1919
essay Das Unheimliche (‘The Uncanny’). Since Nicholas Royle has
already written a satisfying historisation of the uncanny (2003), this
paper will directly focus on an object that is historically central to, if
not intertwined with the discussion and formulation of the uncanny:
the automaton. The uncertainty of having ‚a human person or rather
an automaton before him‛, Jentsch wrote (1906: 11); Freud rephrased
‚the theme of the doll Olympia (<) must be held responsible for the
quite unparalleled atmosphere of uncanniness evoked by the story
*of E.T.A. Hoffman’s Der Sandmann+‛ (1911: 202). Nakamura, too,
devotes an entire subsection of her article to describe how none of
the ostensibly human characters in Dogura Magura are a coherent
purely ‚natural‛ subject, indeed (2006: 12-18).

Here, again, we see tension between the dichotomy, or lack thereof – to follow
Latour (1993) – of modernity; this literary mode of the uncanny transgresses, not
unlike Haraway’s cyborg, the traditional subject-object binary.
37 This is apparent in Yumeno’s text since Western science is presented an opposing
dark force to Japanese culture (Nakamura, 2006: 11).
36

24

Especially in light of Nakamura’s context of early modern Japan,
the emphasis on the automaton evokes notions about karakuri, short
for karakuri ningyō (‘automaton’), which can also be translated as
‘mechanism’, ‘device’ or even ‘trick.’ The arrival of a Western clock
in Japan halfway during the sixteenth century ultimately led to the
development of these mechanically complex animated figures, a
development highly prevalent in the Tokugawa period. However, as
anthropologist Masao Yamaguchi contends in his excellent chapter
on the ludic nature of Japan’s modernisation, ‚we can say that the
Japanese learnt to tame the machine by means of the karakuri puppet
because they considered the puppet an extension and copy of the
human figure, not as something sent by demons or animated by the
divine‛ (Yamaguchi, 2002: 78). Whereas the automaton evoked an
uncanny feeling in Western societies – e.g. the aforementioned doll
Olympia in Der Sandmann, or Fritz Lang’s dystopian film Metropolis
(Lang, 1927), in which a robot agitates human labourers – the
Japanese enjoyed the presence of automata in a similar manner as
they enjoyed domesticated animals, namely as charming copies of
the human figure (Yamaguchi: 79).38 In other words, unlike Western
societies, the Japanese felt especially sentiments of similarity, if not
affection, towards automata. This affection towards machinery will
be central to the discussion that follows in the next subsection.

So far, this subsection has been a discussion based on accounts
regarding the conceptualisation of the uncanniness of the humanmachine interface. Examining SJ through the framework established
by this interface, it becomes apparent that the uncanny (and intimate
virtuality, as discussed in the following subsection) towards the
machine – and the nonhuman – can be distinguished at two levels:
the ludic level, i.e. the integration of the uncanny in the gameplay,
A possible reason why automata were cherished during the Tokugawa period yet
feared in pre-war Japan is that the Japanese intellectuals may not have been concerned
with the automata themselves, but rather with the penetration of Western sciences and
thoughts in a nation that had been isolated from the rest of the world for 250 years. To
cite Nakamura once again, this mechanical uncanny of Japanese intellectuals ‚marked
by a certain loss of both individual and national identity and a certain nostalgia for a
pre-Westernized Japan‛ (2006: 11).
38

25

will be discussed in a critical dialogue with the affection towards the
machine in this chapter’s final subsection; the narratological level, i.e.
the game’s diegetic reality, requires a close examination of one of the
main supporting characters of the game. The following subsection
will discuss another supporting character, one that can be associated
with the concept of intimate virtuality.
Considering the importance to ‘Always contextualize!’,39 the
premise of SJ will be briefly summarised. Set in the present,
Antarctica, serving as the game’s main setting (unlike Tokyo in
foregoing entries in the series), is exponentially being consumed by a
hyperspace, which scientist readily have dubbed the ‘Schwarzwelt’. 40
To investigate this imminent worldwide threat, the United Nations
sends off four vehicles with the world’s most prestigious scientists,
soldiers and technologies. Upon penetrating the Schwarzwelt, three
vehicles are damaged beyond repair and the hyperspace offers no
simple exit.41 The player, assuming the role of an American soldier
(or Japanese in the Japanese version of the game), is requested to
investigate the whereabouts of the Schwarzwelt, only to discover
that it is inhabited by demonic creatures seeking to take control of
the human world. His Demonica suit (q.v. note 32) allows him to not
only see the otherwise invisible demons, but also to interact with
them. He and his colleagues then visit several locations spread
throughout the Schwarzwelt, which correspond with sectors,
alphabetically named after constellations, such as Antlia and Boötes,
and are being governed by a demon lord, each with its own methods
This is a reference to Fredric Jameson’s rallying cry ‘Always Historicize!’ in the
preface to his work The Political Unconscious (1981).
40 Mari Nakamura pointed out to me that SJ’s investigation of the Schwarzwelt and the
human inability to communicate with the nonhuman without depending on autotranslation technologies is similar to the premise of the 1961 SF novel Solaris by the
Polish author Stanislaw Lem. Similar to SJ, the nonhuman in Solaris (the eponymous
sentient planet) tests the human scientists by materialising human simulacra derived
from the scientists’ repressed feelings and memories. Incapable to conceptualise
Solaris’ actions through human consciousness and science, the story emphasises the
failure of the human to communicate with the extraterrestrial nonhuman (cf. Jameson,
2007: 108-118).
41 The Schwarzwelt’s outer barrier is a ‚plasma cloud that dismantles all approaching
objects at molecular level‛ (Zelenin in SJ). The investigation team’s highly advanced
vehicles use a ‚plasma engine to penetrate the protective wall‛ (AI computer Arthur
in SJ). Once penetrated the wall and arrived in the Schwarzwelt, it becomes clear the
investigation team is only able to leave the hyperspace through the ‘Vanishing Point’,
the Schwarzwelt’s only exit and guarded by a fierce demon lord.
39

26

or political motives to pursue humanity’s destruction.42 The sectors
largely appear as reflective constructions of the seven deadly sins,
starting off with wrath, lust and gluttony.
The character in question is the cold-blooded Russian
scientist Zelenin, holding the rank of First Lieutenant. She maintains
a professional attitude throughout the narrative yet remains reluctant
to recruit demons as partners for battles. This unwillingness is
further fuelled by fear when she is captured by a demon lord for in
vivo testing in order to contribute to the demons’ knowledge of the
human biology. Saved in time by the angelic demon Mastema, 43 who
later forces another angelic demon into her Demon Summoning
Program for her own protection, Zelenin becomes interested in
Mastema to the extent that she allows him to transform her into an
angel. This mode of being enables her to sing a hymn which soothes
the minds of humans. Despite her blind loyalty to Mastema and
other angelic demons, Zelenin constantly emphasises her distrust
and discomfort in cooperating with demons; in Zelenin’s case, her
attitude towards the demons would best be described as uncanniness
– familiar yet foreign.
It is obvious that Zelenin’s reluctance stems from her
uncertainty regarding the metaphysics of the demons and the world
they inhabit, the Schwarzwelt. Unable to obtain answers to her
questions – ‘what are demons?’, ‘can I trust them?’, ‘why should I
trust them?’ – through logical empiricism, Zelenin determines to
remain unaffiliated with the demons. In order to reassure Zelenin –
and to satisfy the curiosity of the reader of this thesis – the remaining
part of this subsection will examine uncanniness and the

The Antlia sector lord, known as Morax, considers mimicking human warfare as the
most successful method (‚Nothing is more efficient at slaying humans than humans
themselves! We need only to mimic you to slaughter humans on a grand scale!‛).
Mitra of Boötes, interested in human biology, is offended by the human revolt
(‚Humans bleed pointless blood! Humans breathe pointless air! Humans think
pointless thoughts! In every way, shape, and form, humans are pointless creatures‛).
These political motives may be interpreted as arguments against war and experiments
on animals, respectively.
43 Mastema, also known as Mansemat, is ‚the father of all evil, yet subservient to God‛
according to the Old Testament Apocrypha. It is said Mastema tempts humans, only to
execute them by employing the many demons he commands (Oliver and Lewis, 2008:
240-241).
42

27

metaphysics of SJ’s demon world through the framework established
in the previous section.
The demon in SJ, invisible to the naked eye but rendered
visible through the Demonica suit (interface: human dependent on
machine), is the personification of an accumulation of descriptors for
sacred or religious entities as recorded in religious texts and other
chronicles. Like Derrida’s monster – ‚a composite figure of
heterogeneous organisms that are grafted unto each other‛ (1995:
385) – the demon, too, manifests itself as an ‘imaginary’ monster
comprising components resembling parts from the human body and
the animal body. Imaginary, here, is put between quotation marks to
point out that the demon’s appearance (or, to put it in non-diegetic
context: the designs drawn by artist Kazuma Kaneko), background,
and sometimes even attitude, are inspired by our, i.e. real-life
humans, ancestors’ descriptions of imaginary supernatural entities. 44
Concluding that the SJ demon thus must be an incarnation of a
supernatural entity is too quick: the demon proclaims it once was –
being worshipped by humans in ancient times – but no longer is.45
The demon, then, may be regarded as an entity degraded or lowered
from the supernatural world to the material world (cf. Bakhtin, 1984);
followers of Apollinaris46 would have described the demon as tertium
quid, since it is neither human nor divine (cf. LaBare, 2011); similar to
the Harawayian cyborg (1985), the demon is derived from human
imagination – suggesting it is an object – yet maintaining an
autonomy equal, if not superior to that of the human (q.v. note 42);
and the challenge it poses for the subject-object binary as a hybrid, an
‘instable event’, is Zelenin’s inability to translate the hybrid within
Kazuma Kaneko has described the process of designing as follows: ‚When I design
demons, I start by researching their profiles in legends and folklores. Gods and
demons that appear in myths greatly reflect the environment, culture and customs of
the area they originate from. For example, both Zeus from Greek mythology and Thor
from Norse mythology are thunder gods, but their attire and equipment are quite
different. I get all that information in my head first, then give the demons new form,
sometimes in accordance with their traditional image, and in other times giving them
a modern interpretation. Once that's done, the only thing left is for me to draw them in
a pose that fits their character‛ (Moore, 2010: 1).
45 This can be interpreted as a decline in dominance of religions throughout the world.
46 Declared a heresy by the First Council of Constantinople during the fourth century
B.C., the theology Apollinarism contended that Jesus Christ was neither human nor
God and thus a tertium quid (note 74 in Stalling, 2010: 232).
44

28

the subject-object binary of Latour’s modernity (2003). Indeed,
familiar (as autonomous as humans) 47 yet foreign (but it is no
human!) – the uncanny is a precise description of Zelenin’s sentiment
toward the SJ demon.

Intimate virtuality
Zelenin’s uncanniness represents roughly one part of the human
investigation team. Her adversary in the human-machine and
human-nonhuman interface is the American mercenary Jimenez,
who does not mince matters regarding interaction with the demon
and embraces each possibility of cooperation. At the time Zelenin
was held prison, Jimenez rescued the demon Bugaboo from an
experiment and rapidly forms a close bond with the demon. Halfway
through the game, Jimenez is instructed to keep his weather-eye
open at the entrance of a human-made sector. Discovering Bugaboo
had gone missing, Jimenez entered the base to look for his demon
and discovered that the locals (humans not part of the investigation
team) 48 had been using living demons as spare parts to fuse with
weaponry. In Jimenez’s attempt to destroy most of the equipment, he
and Bugaboo were caught and subjected to similar experiments
themselves. At the time the player arrives, Bugaboo is losing its
consciousness and Jimenez asks the protagonist to fuse him with
Bugaboo. Upon doing so, ‘Awake Jimenez’ is created and uses his
newfound prowess to take revenge on the humans who have
tortured him. In light of the present discussion, Jimenez’s
affectionate attitude towards Bugaboo can be considered as a degree
of ‘intimate virtuality’ wherein he was willing to sacrifice his life as a

It is noteworthy that none of the game’s human characters relate the demon to a
supernatural entity from worldwide chronicles, despite the demons themselves
constantly suggest, and some even state, the existence of this relation. Hence, I do not
consider the familiarity of Zelenin’s uncanny feeling the result of her considering this
demon-supernatural entity relation.
48 This group of human mercenaries, known as Jack’s Squad, have invaded the
Schwarzwelt to exploits materials and demons for financial purposes. Using more
powerful versions of machinery used by the investigation team, they were able to erect
a sector in the Schwarzwelt.
47

29

human and to continue living as half-human, half-nonhuman
hybrid.49
‘Intimate virtuality’ is a term coined by anthropologist Anne
Allison in a chapter on Pokémon in her monograph Millennial
Monsters: Japanese Toys and the Global Imagination (2006) to describe
the ‚virtualization in this *Pokémon’s+ mobile, interactive, and
addictive human-machine interface‛ (266). As I contend that intimate
virtuality is better understood within the context of techno-intimacy
– based on the order of chapters in Allison’s book, she would agree
with me50 – this subsection will start by providing a brief overview of
the development of techno-intimacy in Japan.
Allison distinguishes a techno-ideological shift towards the end of
the twentieth century (ibidem: 188-191). In the aftermath of World
War II, ideologies regarding Japan’s rebuild were largely initiated
and drawn from manga and animation series. For instance, the
humanoid eponymous protagonist in Osamu Tezuka’s Tetsuwan
Atomu (‘Astro Boy’, 1952) or the popularisation of mecha, humanoid
robots often used for battle purposes, in the animated science fiction
series Kidō Senshi Gandamu (‘Mobile Suit Gundam’, 1979). Even shōjo
(‘girls’), a lifestyle originally associated with girl-ish behaviour, 51
turned warriors in Bishōjo Senshi Sailor Moon (‘Pretty Soldier Sailor
Moon’, 1991). However, following Allison, a shift occurred towards
the end of the century:
Techno-intimacy is a sign of the times. While mecha-tronics was the fantasy
as well as national policy for rebuilding Japan after the war – remaking the
country as a techno supernation – sof-tronics is the symptom and corrective
to this industrial master plan in the new millennium – assuaging the
atomism, alienation, and stress of corporatist capitalism with virtual
companionship (2006: 190, her italics)

Technically speaking, the demon Bugaboo Jimenez befriended is an artificially
created demon, the outcome of an experiment. The game states that Bugaboo consists
for 75% of demon genetic material, suggesting the other 25% was derived from fellow
Schwarzwelt investigation team members.
50 Introducing the term ‘techno-intimacy’ during the sixth chapter on the Tamagotchi
devices, Allison continues to build on this form of intimacy in the two subsequent
chapters on Pokémon, only to briefly coin ‘intimate virtuality’ toward the end of the
last chapter.
51 While ‘girl’ is a literal and correct translation of shōjo, this term is more often
associated with the shōjo as a phenomenon within academic discourses.
49

30

What, precisely, has led to this techno-ideological shift, or collapse of
meta-narrative of imagination, Allison does not point out, but she
stresses the demand for techno-intimacy, or ‚s(t)imulation of social
intercourse‛ (ibidem: 190). 52 This demand was first satisfied by
Japanese toy company Bandai’s Tamagotchi devices in 1996, but two
years and forty million sold units later, the craze suddenly died off.
However, Allison argues, the ‚mechanical fantasy it gave form to –
techno-intimacy – has only intensified in the years afterward‛
(ibidem: 188).53
This intensification of techno-intimacy as a form of mechanical
fantasy

is

clearly

visible

in

modern

Japan-made

popular

commodities. In his celebrated work Otaku: Japan’s Database Animals
(Azuma, 2009), originally published in Japanese in 2001, Japanese
critic Hiroki Azuma distinguishes a Lyotardian collapse of grand
narratives in the domain of Japanese popular works. This collapse,
preceded by the obsessive consumptions of fictive narratives as
substitutions for real grand narratives (e.g. political ideologies) in the
1980s (cf. Otsuka, 2010), led to what Azuma has called ‘the grand
nonnarrative’ (Azuma, 2009: 34ff.). Basically, this grand nonnarrative
postulates that fans do not longer engage in ‘small narratives’ (that is,
episodes) to gradually discover the underlying grand narrative, but
prefer to engage in small narratives through a Derridean mode of
consciousness, deconstructing what is perceived, often characters,
into fragments and use these to reconstruct derivative works, or
simulacra (ibidem: 47ff.; Lamarre, 2009: 257-64). In short, the shift
from narrative-centred productions in the 1980s to character-centred
franchises in the 1990s that Azuma describes, corresponds with
Allison’s observations regarding the shift from techno-ideological
fantasies of constructing a techno supernation in post-war Japan to

Elsewhere I have suggested a connection between the collapse of Allison’s
understanding of mecha-tronics with the end of the broadcast of highly influential
animation series Shinseiki Evangelion (‘Neon Genesis Evangelion’) in 1996 (Van Zoggel,
2011b).
53 The definition and use of ‘techno-intimacy’ is highly context dependent. Other uses
of the term, for example, emphasise the paradoxical convenience of everyday
technology (Cumiskey, 2005) or the ambivalent relationship between the desire to be
connected and the need to stand apart (De Vries, 2009).
52

31

the demand for ‘s(t)imulation of social intercourse’ – what Azuma
would call ‘simulacrum’.
It is this emphasis on character-centred franchises that have
become a key phenomenon in understanding techno-intimacy in
relation to games. Building on Allison and Azuma’s observations,
Patrick W. Galbraith has argued that dating simulation video games,
such as LovePlus (Konami, 2009), which offers open-ended
interactions with three virtual girls, open up the possibilities of
‚becoming‛ with a technological ‚companion species‛ (Galbraith,
2011; cf. Van Zoggel, 2011b). Despite this reference to Haraway’s
provocative thesis (q.v. note 10), it should be noted that the virtual
girls in LovePlus resemble human girls54 and that the ultimate goal is
to marry one of the girls. 55 While it remains debatable to which
degree the virtual girls of LovePlus may or may not be regarded as
‘human’ or ‘real’, as some fans ‚resort to fictionalization in order to
possess the object of their love‛ (Saitō, 2007: 227),56 this thesis – and
this subsection in particular – is concerned with companion species
that are considered nonhuman in both ‘our’ reality as well the
diegetic reality.
In returning to the aforementioned case study of SJ with Jimenez
and his demonic fellow Bugaboo, it is safe to say that Allison’s
concept of ‘intimate virtuality’ is involved in both the humannonhuman

interface

and

human-machine

interface.

Intimate

virtuality – although it is never clearly defined by Allison herself –
might be understood as a mode of consciousness wherein a human
player

resorts

to

virtualisation

(perhaps

similar

to

Saitō’s

‚fictionalization‛) to enable himself or herself to interact with virtual,
nonhuman species through a human-machine interface. This humanIn order to avoid drawing too much attention to the discussion on realism and its
innumerable definitions – which is not relevant to the rest of this thesis – I have
deliberately chosen to use ‘human girls’ rather than ‘real girls’. For fruitful discussions
on realism in digital imagery, see Manovich (1992; 2001, especially chapter four).
55 There have been accounts of players who extend their marriage with the virtual girls
beyond the game (Van Zoggel, 2011b: 10), which in turn pose interesting questions
regarding taking experiences in games beyond its medium (cf. Copier, 2007).
56 This is one of the four descriptors of the otaku by psychoanalyst Tamaki Saitō. The
others are as follows: having an affinity for fictional context; having multiple
orientations when it comes to enjoying fiction; for them fiction itself can be a sexual
object (Saitō, 2007: 227).
54

32

nonhuman-machine interface, then, is – similar, if not identical to
Allison’s example of Pokémon – at work at two levels. On the level of
the diegesis, the highly technological Demonica suit (machine)
renders the otherwise invisible demon visible, translates demon
language to its user’s native tongue and allows its user to install
applications57 on the Demonica OS to influence the user’s interaction
with the Schwarzwelt and its demonic inhabitants. Building even
further on parallels with the Pokémon series, the Demonica ‘stores’
demons that are part of the active party (compare to the Poké Ball);58
the Demon Compendium serves as a database of registered demons
which can be summoned for a fee of money (Pokémon Storage
System, albeit this one is free of charge); and the application Demon
Analyze displays a demon’s data and its folkloric background
(versus Pokédex). The final comparison with Pokémon – for now –
raises the human-nonhuman-machine interface from the diegetic
level to the nondiegetic level of ‘our’ reality. Even though the Shin
Megami Tensei games have rarely, if ever prior to SJ, been concerned
with intercommunication among players, which can be considered as
Pokémon’s very raison d’être,59 SJ introduced a method for players to
exchange demons by inserting a 32 digit code in the Demon
Compendium – or obtaining an unique demon through a password
provided directly by creator Atlus.60
In closing up the subsection on the uncanny, techno-intimacy,
intimate virtuality and the complex interplay of the human-

Whereas the main applications are essential for advancing the narrative (e.g.
unlocking particular doors and providing access to hidden dimension within the
Schwarzwelt), the sub applications are generally additions which ease the burden of
exploring the Schwarzwelt (e.g. health regenerators, decrease hostile surprise attacks,
ability to fuse rare demons).
58 According to Pokémon creator Satoshi Tajiri, the idea behind the process of ‘catching’
the monsters in battles is dētaka (‘data-fication’), ‚the reconfiguration of value from a
material form (monsters) into data that are storable, portable, and transferable (via
communication cables on the Game Boy)‛ (Alison, 2006: 221).
59 Pokémon creator Satoshi Tajiri’s ‚novel‛ idea to use the Game Boy’s tsūshin kēberu
(‘communication cable’) for communication rather than taisen (‘battling’) was praised
by Nintendo as ‚innovative‛ and was allowed to develop what ultimately would
become Pokémon – on the condition that Tajiri would include taisen elements, as well
(Allison, 2006: 200).
60 Rather than depending on external technologies, namely exchanging monsters
through wireless connections (e.g. recent Pokémon instalments), this static model of
exchange is more accessible since the passwords can be inserted at any time and
everywhere.
57

33

nonhuman-machine interface, I would like to turn to a frequently
cited statement by Derrida regarding his conceptualisation of the
discursive monster: ‚Monsters cannot be announced. One cannot
say: ‘here are our monsters’, without immediately turning the
monsters into pets‛, (80) he wrote in 1989. Here, as will be discussed
in more detail in the following subsection, Derrida is concerned with
a process similar to Latour’s purification (i.e. the process of
stabilising hybrids to fit within the subject-object binary), namely the
deconstruction – to stay within Derridean terminology – of what is
unknown to reconstruction into the domain of what is known. In the
light of SJ, it is clear that Zelenin, largely due to fear, has not engaged
in this deconstruction and thus fails to perceive the demons as
something other than frightening monstrosities. Jimenez, however,
readily reconstructed the demons in the domain of what is known,
‚immediately turning the monsters into pets‛. Whereas Zelenin is
unable to obtain answers to her questions – ‘what are demons?’, ‘can
I trust them?’, ‘why should I trust them?’ – through logical
empiricism (to cite myself, p. 27), it is Jimenez, testifying to a
boundless naiveté, who considers the demons – to cite a ten-year old
boy on Pokémon – as ‚imaginary partners, creatures that can be your
loyal pet if you control them (<) sort of like animals that are real
except mutated‛ (Allison, 2006: 205).

Anti-human exceptionalism
Having demonstrated the conceptual dialogue between the uncanny
and intimate virtuality on a narratological level at length, this
chapter’s final subsection will shift focus to the ludic level. This ludic
level is concerned with reflections of the uncanny and intimate
virtuality on the level of gameplay mechanisms. Since Pokémon has
proven to be a fruitful addition to the discussion on the humannonhuman-machine interface in SJ, this subsection will provide a
similar comparative study.

34

Theoretically speaking the process of recruiting, training and
employing nonhuman creatures in battle in Shin Megami Tensei61 is
highly comparable, if not identical to the core principle of the
Pokémon games. In each main instalment of the Pokémon series,62 the
player assumes the role of a teenager who aspires to become the
world’s best Pokémon trainer, in which ‘Pokémon’ refers to the
nonhuman creatures, or ‘pocket monsters’, which can be caught,
domesticated63 and deployed in battles against other Pokémon (cf.
Allison, 2006: 192-233). Inspired by his childhood memories of
collecting and exchanging bugs, Pokémon is director Satoshi Tajiri’s
nostalgic envisionment of pre-industrial Japan, an attempt to provide
companionship

to

those,

especially children;

suffering from

‘solitarism’ (ibidem: 201; cf. Turkle, 2011).

Apart from ‘Fight’ and ‘Flee’, usual battle options in role-playing game, the Shin
Megami Tensei games offer the possibility to ‘Talk’. While some demons refuse to
converse (for reasons unknown to the player) or are simply unable to communicate in
a comprehensible manner (such as growling), others are interested in their human
visitors and question the whereabouts of humankind. These questions, ranging from
requesting a joke to an inquiry into metaphysical differences between demons and
humans, can be answered by picking one of three answers provided by the game.
Whether an answer is accepted or rejected by the demon depends on various factors;
this may be influenced by, among other factors, its demonic race, its gender, the
folkloric character the demon is based on, or the player’s attributes. Failure results in
upsetting the demon, causing it to either attack the player or making it leave. In other
words, through trial and error the player has to learn about the nonhuman in order to
successfully converse with them. Negotiation becomes available once the player has
been able to provide two accepted answers. He is then offered the choice to pursue
recruitment or to request Macca (money) or an item. While the latter two will readily
be provided by the demon, recruitment involves a series of sacrifices by the player. In
exchange for money, items, his health (expressed in HP, or ‘health power’) or his spirit
(MP, or ‘magic power’), the demon will consider the player’s offer to join his party.
While in most cases the demon will be glad or even honoured to participate in the
player’s endeavours to explore the Schwarzwelt, in some occasions the demon cancels
the negotiation, taking the offerings with them – ‚maybe *demons] are not so different
from humans after all‛, chief designer Eiji Ishida has once put it (Loe, 2010: 71).
62 With main installments, I refer to the flagship entries of each so-called ‘Pokémon
generation’: Pokémon Red, Blue and Yellow (the first generation; for Game Boy); Pokémon
Silver, Gold and Crystal (the second generation; for Game Boy Color); Pokémon Ruby,
Sapphire and Emerald (the third generation; for Game Boy Advance); Pokémon Diamond,
Pearl and Platinum (the fourth generation; for Nintendo DS); and Pokémon Black Version,
White Version and the respective sequel to each (the fifth generation; also for Nintendo
DS).
63 Anna Tsing has criticised common ideas regarding domestication of nonhuman
animals. She argues that ‚domestication tends to be imagined as a hard line: You are
either in the human fold or you are out in the wild. Because this dichotomization
stems from an ideological commitment to human mastery, it supports the most
outrageous fantasies of domestic control, on the one hand, and wild species selfmaking, on the other. Through such fantasies, domestics are condemned to life
imprisonment and genetic standardization, while wild species are ‚preserved‛ in gene
banks while their multi-species landscapes are destroyed‛ (Tsing, forthcoming.: 6).
61

35

Unlike the nonhumans in Shin Megami Tensei, often mature
and horrific in design, the nonhuman characters in Pokémon are
ubiquitously recognised as kawaii (‘cute’) – and might even embody
the ‚transspecies potential‛ described by Lamarre (2010: 63ff.) 64 –,
resulting in the player’s deep attachments to these characters (Allison,
2006: 205-6). In fact, as I have argued elsewhere (Van Zoggel, 2011b:
8), while players have been able to obtain at least 151 Pokémon since
the first generation of Pokémon games, 65 most player grow attached
to their first Pokémon to the degree that they keep this very
Pokémon present in the active party, rather than ‘storing’ them in a
personal in-game databases, throughout the entire game. In other
words, this attachment to the nonhuman characters in Pokémon,
originally conceived by Tajiri, having the concept of ‘technological
companion species’ in mind, is the product of Allison’s ‘intimate
virtuality.’
However, I argue that this intimate virtuality in Pokémon is
not only the product of the player’s attachment to the domesticated
Pokémon, but first and foremost a response to the game’s premise of
the uncanny. This means that both intimate virtuality (and technointimacy) and the uncanny are at work in Pokémon: the player indeed
readily establishes a bond with the domesticated nonhuman
characters he has obtained, but– and this is crucial – is not able to do
otherwise. For example, in the first generation Pokémon games, once
the

players

directs

his

iconographic

avatar,

represents

an

adventurous 11-year old boy canonically known as Red, towards an
area outside the borders of its home town, Red is halted by the local
Pokémon professor, who states that ‚It’s unsafe! Wild Pokémon live
in tall grass. You need your own Pokémon for your protection.‛ The
player sees Red being escorted to the professor’s Pokémon laboratory
to choose one out of three ‘starter’ Pokémon. What we see here, is

Lamarre describes the ‘transspecies potential’ as an act of ‚an affective force that
hovers over and permeates the cruel Darwinist cosmos, revealing itself in tragic
sacrifices that promise salvation rather than alternative ideals‛ (2010: 65).
65 Each subsequent generation expands the Pokémon universe with approximately 150
new Pokémon. In the most recent installments, Pokémon Black Version and White Version
(Game Freak, 2011), 649 different Pokémon can be caught in total.
64

36

that a (team of) Pokémon is required to supplement the player’s lack
of fighting abilities to form a unity that is allowed to traverse the
world.
Despite being a teenager, this vulnerability and lack of
freedom, or even limitations, of Red as a human being, evokes
notions of the uncanny: on the one hand, as a human being, he is
familiar and similar to the player, but on the other hand, he is
dehumanised – e.g. Red’s inability to autonomously advance – to the
extent that his presence outside his native town requires the support
of at least one nonhuman species. Therefore, as I argued before,
affectionate human-nonhuman relations in Pokémon are readily
established, primarily because of interpersonal dependency. The
mechanical uncanny, then, serves as the game’s initial premise (the
hero who is not able to fight himself and is dependent on Pokémon),
solved by the local Pokémon professor, who provides the player with
a Pokémon (and giving the intimate virtuality a push). Ultimately,
considering the fairly predictable and repetitive storylines among the
Pokémon games, it is this intimate virtuality that has been keeping the
franchise running and popular for over seventeen years now.
Whereas the buddings of intimate virtuality in Pokémon can
be distinguished as essential for the game’s propulsion and the
series’ popularity, it is this affection of the player toward the
nonhuman in Shin Megami Tensei that is presented as counterproductive. Both the human protagonist and his demonic allies gain
experience points at the end of each battle. The demons, however,
require proportionally many more of these points to gain a certain
level (and thus to become stronger) than the human protagonist. This
means that employing a demon for a longer period of time is
disadvantageous to the player; indeed, the demons are merely
‘weapons’ – at least gameplay-wise. However, they also serve as
‘elements’ or ‘materials’ to fuse one demon with another to create a
new, often stronger entity. This ‘Demon Fusion Program’, presented
as an application of the protagonist’s Demonica suit, even allows the

37

player to add a source from a third demon66 to the fusion to bestow
additional power upon the new entity. While fusing demons – by
perceiving them as weapons or materials – proves to be an essential
tool in navigating through the Schwarzwelt, the excerpt in the
introduction to this thesis shows it is not without ethical
consequences.

Thus,

whereas

Pokémon

is dependent on an

affectionate human-nonhuman-machine interface, it is Shin Megami
Tensei which challenges, or perhaps even rejects affectionate relations
by rendering these counter-productive.

This section has sought answers to the questions – as posed during
the introduction to this thesis – regarding the interaction between
individual components of the ‘monster’. Whereas the interface of
human-nonhuman-machine is affectionate and interdependent in the
case of the Pokémon series, it is a complex correlation – transcending
and transgressing the boundaries in between the domains of
individual components – that encompasses both the concepts of the
uncanny and intimate virtuality, wherein the former exists as a
condition to realise the latter.
This section has made clear – or, attempts to clarify – that the
demon, the nonhuman in SJ is neither hostile nor affectionate toward
the human in nature. The demon appears as an autonomous monster,
a grotesque manifestation of human imagination – a foreign
composition of familiar components – whose imbroglio-esque
arrivant challenges the human cherished subject-object binary. It is a
tool for the human to ‚become aware of the history of normality‛
(Derrida, 1995: 386); a tool, a tertium quid, developed by the domain
of the object (earth, as will be discussed in greater detail in the
following section) to put the subject into a parlous state, ‚allowing an
analysis of the history of the norms‛ (ibidem: 385-6). By ‚staging an
encounter between the human and the nonhuman‛ (Lamarre, 2008:
71-2), SJ violates the order of things: it not only interrogates the
subject-object binary, it also questions the binary’s supposedly
The player receives a demon’s ‘source’ if he is able to gain its trust by regularly
employing the demon in battle.
66

38

hierarchical order in terms of anthropocentrism, or, to cite Haraway,
‚the culturally normal fantasy of human exceptionalism‛ (2008: 11). 67
In sum, this is the discursive ‘monster’ of this thesis – ready to be
unleashed unto ‘our’ world in the following section.

In her impressive monograph When Species Meet (2008), Haraway introduces the
notion of human exceptionalism trough the following anecdote. ‚At one of the
conference panels, I heard a sad man in the audience say that rape seems a legitimate
instrument against those who rape the earth; he seemed to regard this as an
ecofeminist position, to the horror of the men and women of that political persuasion
in the room. Everyone I heard at the session thought the guy was slightly dangerous
and definitely politically embarrassing, but mainly crazy in the colloquial sense if not
the clinical. Nonetheless, the quasi-psychotic panic quality of the man’s threatening
remarks is worth some attention because of the way the extreme shows the underside
of the normal. In particular, this would-be rapist-in-defense-of-mother-earth seems
shaped by the culturally normal fantasy of human exceptionalism.‛ (2008: 10-1). The
reason for citing this at length is its relevance for the upcoming section of the thesis.
67

39

Content of critique

‚Cyborg and companion species each bring together the human and the
non-human, the organic and the technological, carbon and silicon, freedom
and structure, history and myth, the rich and the poor, the state and the
subject, diversity and depletion, modernity and postmodernity, and nature
and culture in unexpected ways.‛
- Donna Haraway (2003: 4)

‚Human exceptionalism blinds us‛, anthropologist Anna Tsing
contends in her essay on fungi and species interdependence,
‚[s]pecies interdependence is a well-known fact—except when it
comes to humans‛ (Tsing, forthcoming 5). Allied in this ecofeminist
approach with Haraway in an endeavour to demolish the
dichotomous wall between society and nature – what Latour has
called ‘the Great Divides’ (2005) – Tsing goes on by arguing that
Science has inherited stories about human mastery from the great
monotheistic religions. These stories fuel assumptions about human
autonomy, and they direct questions to the human control of nature, on the
one hand, or human impact on nature, on the other, rather than to species
interdependence. (Tsing, forthcoming: 5)

Tsing’s perspective on human exceptionalism serves as an
appropriate point of access to this thesis’ final section, wherein the
‘monster’, which has been carefully deconstructed throughout the
previous sections, will be repurposed as a crucial argument in the
discussion on the concept of utopia in the field of sf studies. The
primary intent of this section is not to refute established notions
regarding utopia or revolutionise the field, but to demonstrate how
the ‘monster’ can be employed as an argument or method in a debate
(rather than an isolated theory as it has been hitherto). Therefore, this
40

section will turn to just one, yet important essay in the field of sf
studies, namely Fredric Jameson’s ‚Progress versus Utopia, or, Can
We Imagine the Future?‛.
Despite being published as a singular book, Fredric Jameson’s
Archaeologies of the Future (2005) actually consists of two books: ‘The
Desire Called Utopia’, an extensive examination of utopias presented
in numerous works of sf (primarily literary works, though); and
‘Other Science Fictions’, a collection of previously written essays that
deal with sf. Even though this book is arguably even more difficult to
read than his inquiry into ‘postmodernism’ in his 1991 work
Postmodernism, or, the Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism, largely thanks
to the speculative subject of the former, it questions whether the
concept of utopia is still relevant to the present. In doing so, Jameson
demonstrates that the concept still is a useful method to rethink, for
example, the present.
In ‚Progress versus Utopia, or, Can We Imagine the Future?‛,
published as the fourth chapter of ‘Other Science Fictions’, Jameson
argues that the utopia, or the ultimate ‚text‛, does not exist in an
‚empirical‛

form

and

must

therefore

be

constructed

by

reconstructing empirical ‚texts‛ (Jameson, 2007: 283, his emphasises).
For Jameson, building on Georg Luk{cs’ observations in The
Historical Novel (1936), this Derrida-esque understanding led to the
observation that all history plays by e.g. Shakespeare and Corneille
affirm
the past as being essentially the same as the present, and do not yet confront
the great discovery of the modern historical sensibility, that the past, the
various pasts, are culturally original, and radically distinct from our own
experience of the object-world of the present. (ibidem: 284).

The utopian futures of, for example, Jules Verne and H.G. Wells have
become dated and historical, and can be reduced to a future of a
moment of what is now history. Therefore, Jameson continues, sf
conceals a complex temporal structure which does not provide
visions of the future, but rather ‚defamiliarize[s] and restructure[s]
our experience of our own present (<) in specific ways distinct from
41

all forms of defamiliarization‛ (ibidem: 286, his italics). In the
discussion that follows, the ‘monster’ will attempt to frighten
Jameson’s ‘complex temporal structure’ and make it fall to prey.
Jameson further develops this idea of defamiliarisation by
remarking that sf ‚does not seriously attempt to imagine the ‚real‛
future of our social system. Rather, its multiple mock futures serve
the quite different function of transforming our own present into the
determinate past of something yet to come‛ (ibidem: 288).
Demonstrating his argument through Raymond Chandler’s futuristic
vision of now historic Los Angeles, he concludes that ‚*sf] thus
enacts and enables a structurally unique ‚method‛ for apprehending
the present as history, and this is so irrespective of the ‚pessimism‛
or ‚optimism‛ of the imaginary future world which is the pretext for
that defamiliarization‛ (ibidem: 288).68
Jameson’s essay is an invaluable contribution to the field of sf
studies – cited by 186 articles according to Google Scholar – and it
remains,

perhaps

thanks

to

its

respectable

status,

largely

unchallenged. The ‘monster’, however, uninhibited as it may be, will
challenge

some

of

Jameson’s

statements

to

rethinking

the

anthropocentric nature of these statements through the multispeciesistic nature of the ‘monster’. In doing so, the ‘monster’ ‚may
reveal or make one aware of what the norm is‛ (Derrida, 1995: 385);
in this particular case, the norm is what Haraway described as ‚the
culturally normal fantasy of human exceptionalism‛ (2008: 11).
Following Derrida’s logics, having acknowledged the ‘monster’ as a
monster subsequently requires its domestication; one has to, in
Derrida’s words, ‚compare it to the norms, analyze it, consequently
master whatever could be terrifying in this figure of the monster‛
(1995: 386). This section will thus compare the centralised role of the
human in some of Jameson’s arguments to the ‘monstrous’ humannonhuman-machine interface in SJ, as elaborated in the previous
section.
The influence of science fiction in Jameson’s perception of postmodernism might be
apparent in his 1983 essay, ‚Postmodernism and Consumer Society‛, in which he
describes a similar temporal structure as a feature of postmodernism: ‚the
transformation of reality into images‛ (1983: 111).
68

42

In expounding his argument that sf is concerned with
defamiliarisation rather than striving to imagine the future, Jameson
frequently employs the pronoun ‘us’ and its possessive sibling ‘our’;
at least four times he refers to not us-the-reader, but to us-the-human
in discursive constructions, such as ‚our social system‛, ‚our own
present‛, ‚this present moment – unavailable to us‛, and ‚our
private fantasies‛ (Jameson, 2007: 288). 69 Before moving on to
discussing the relevance of utopia in contemporary times, Jameson
concludes that ‚*sf’s+ deepest vocation is over and over again to
demonstrate and to dramatize our incapacity to imagine the future
(<)‛ (ibidem: 288-9). With this discursive anthropocentrism and the
afore highlighted ‘complex temporal structure’ of sf as a mode of
narrative, the present discussion will shift focus to the environment
of the ‘monster’.

Paraspaces of the Schwarzwelt
Hitherto its inhabitants and their role in the human-nonhumanmachine interface have been discussed at length yet little attention
has been given to the environments within the peculiar hyperspace
that has been dubbed the Schwarzwelt by its human investigators. In
his chapter ‘Slaveship Earth’ on afrofuturism, Joshua LaBare first
associates the ‚fundamental intertwining of blackness and Africa, or
race and space‛ (LaBare, 2010: 151) with Hegel’s infamous
metahistory, in which he considered Africa a ‚negative space‛ due to
its ‚Unhistorical, Undeveloped Spirit‛ (Hegel, 1956 *1900+: 99). 70
After the appearance of the Schwarzwelt, the human investigators of
SJ had similar ideas regarding the hyperspace. With its demonic
inhabitants more historical and developed than themselves, they
soon came to acknowledge the Schwarzwelt as – following LaBare’s
theorisation of afrofuturism’s Africa – a ‘paraspace’. This term was

Excuse me for having to strip these quotations from their respective sentences.
For Hegel, the absence of history resulted in a negative presence. For him, Africa
was ‚no historical part of the World; it has no movement or development to exhibit‛
(Hegel, 1986 [1900]: 99). Although he acknowledged that, besides Europe, the Orient
(Asia) did have a history, it was nonetheless ‚really unhistorical, for it is only the
repetition of the same majestic ruin‛ (ibidem: 106).
69
70

43

coined by literary critic Samuel Delaney, who argued that a number
of sf writers
posit a normal world – a recognisable future – and then an alternate space,
sometimes largely mental, but always materially manifested, that sits beside
the real world, and in which language is raised to an extraordinarily lyric
level. (<) conflicts that begin in ordinary space are resolved in this
linguistically intensified paraspace‛ (Delaney, 1988: 31).

In other words, Delaney’s ‘paraspace’ is a fictional space exisiting
parallel to what is considered the ‘normal space’ of the diegetic
reality – similar to literary critic Brian McHale’s ‘postmodern zone’:
‚an alien space within a familiar space, or between two adjacent areas
of space where no such ‘between’ exists‛ (1987: 46).71
During the human investigation of the Schwarzwelt paraspace, it
becomes clear that the appearance of the paraspace is fundamentally
related to the planet earth itself; its inhabitants, the demons, as they
themselves claim, were sent to interfere with the human defilement
of ‚the holy realm of the gods‛ (Ouroboros Maia at the end of the
second battle, SJ). By portraying the invading nonhumans as
representatives of the earth’s will, the premise of SJ gives resonance
to the ideas postulated in environmentalist James Lovelock’s ‘Gaia
hypothesis’.

This

hypothesis,

initially

developed

throughout

numerous articles with microbiologist Lynn Margulis, puts forward
the idea that ‚all life and all material parts of the Earth’s surface
make up a single system, a kind of mega-organism, and a living
planet‛ (Lovelock, 2000: x). Considering the first sentence in
Lovelock’s book, in which he describes the organism of Gaia – ‚I had
no clear idea of what Gaia was although I had thought deeply about
her‛ (ibidem: vii) – it should come as no surprise that his most recent
books entitle his concern for his beloved Gaia, such as The Vanishing
Face of Gaia: A Final Warning: Enjoy It While You Can (2006) and The
Revenge of Gaia: Why the Earth Is Fighting Back – and How We Can Still
Save Humanity (2009).
Scott Bukatman has written an excellent chapter on correlations between Delaney’s
‘paraspace’ and McHale’s ‘postmodern zone’ in Terminal Identity: The Virtual Subject in
Postmodern Science Fiction (2002).
71

44

Whether SJ director Kazuma Kaneko has been influenced by
Lovelock is difficult to assess; it is noteworthy, however, that the
concept of Gaia’s vengeance is not unique to SJ among video games,
especially the Japan developed role-playing games. For example, in
Final Fantasy VII (Square, 1997) its planet Gaia

72

spawned

biomechanical entities called WEAPONs to protect itself from the
arrival of one of the major antagonists, Jenova. Ar Ciel, the planet
with consciousness from Ar tonelico Qoga: Knell of Ar Ciel (Gust and
Banpresto, 2011), similarly develops a will to employ antibodies in
order to take its revenge on humans and their warfare, which has
severely damaged the planet. In SJ, the will of the earth is mediated
through the nonhuman entity Mem Aleph, who ‚remembers the
Earth and speaks for it.‛ If the player chooses not to side with
Jimenez’s ideology of ‘Chaos’, Mem Aleph serves as the final boss in
the game and preaches that
There is no trace in you of the humans who once lived alongside my kind<
Humans have fallen so far, becoming nothing but viruses that gnaw away at
the earth. They have become lost souls without a future, who seek to crush
what they do not possess. Your obliviousness to we demons, to the gods of
old, is unfortunate. You mistook yourselves for the center of creation< And
lost the ability to revive the twisted, fallen souls< (Mem Alpeh in SJ)

Apart from Mem Alpeh’s critique on anthropocentrism, it should be
clear why the environments of the Schwarzwelt paraspace form a
relevant, if not an essential, argument in our discussion on
anthropocentrism in Jameson’s essay. The environments, i.e. the
eight nonhuman made sectors in the Schwarzwelt, do not merely
serve as a geographical stage for a human-nonhuman encounter, but
– more importantly – they are also intriguingly interwoven with
what Lamarre described as multispeciesism (2010).
As a result of human environmental pollution, the nonhuman
representative of earth’s will, Mem Aleph, gives rise to the
Schwarzwelt and three daughters (the demonic ‘Mothers’ Ouroboros,

Even though the planet is referred to as ‚The Planet‛ in Final Fantasy VII, it was
retroactively named ‚Gaia‛ in its spin-off CGI film Final Fantasy VII: Advent Children
(2005).
72

45

Tiamat and Maya) to assist her commanding the demon lord of each
sector. Each of these sectors is presented as a materialised
construction of human sins, such as wrath, lust and gluttony. 73 The
sectors, however, are not merely geographical locations within the
Schwarzwelt; they are separated by space-time coordinates and
quantum variables – perhaps we could consider these as ‘paraspaces’
within a ‘paraspace’. In other words, the flow of time within one
sector may differ from the flow of time in other sectors or in ‘normal
space’ on planet earth. Whereas the sectors as reflections of human
sins

are

–

despite

being

highly

exaggerated

–

not

total

defamiliarisations of our present, the volcanic eruptions and lack of
flora in the sector wherein Mem Aleph resides is reminiscent of the
early days of planet earth. It is the fifth sector which appears as the
most peaceful sector, named Eridanus by investigation team, which –
especially in relation to speciesism in the context of Shin Megami
Tensei – is crucial for our discussion on Jameson’s ‘complex temporal
structure’ and discursive anthropocentrism.
Leaving an area filled with walls of decay, one enters a
nonhuman area of tranquil nature in perfect co-existence with
clinically ethereal or perhaps even enlightened technologies (figure
2). In the central tower within this region, screens are embedded in
walls displaying the stark contrast of the aforementioned tranquillity
against the perverted history of the eradicated human. Indeed, the
sector Eridanus portrays an image of planet earth’s ‘normal space’
should the earth and thus its human inhabitants be consumed by the
Schwarzwelt ‘paraspace’. In other words, the vision presented by
sector Eridanus is realisable yet incompatible with the human; the
one condition for realising this utopia is an apocalypse for human
eradication – and hence the title of this thesis.

Although these three sins would suggest that the theme of each sector would follow
the principle of the Seven Deadly Sins, I argue that there is too little evidence in the
remaining sectors to establish this parallel with certainty – yet, I do not rule out the
possibility.
73

46

Figure 2: These illustrations portray the sector Delphinus (top), the
site of destruction, and the sector Eridanus (bottom), the harmonious
utopia. The fighting between the investigation team members in
Delphinus is caused by violent spirit possession, directed by the local
demon lord Asura (Famitsu Shoseki Henshūbu, 2009: 86, 90; ‚Shin
Megami Tensei STRANGE JOURNEY Schwarzwelt Reminiscences‛).

47

However, as Jameson reminds us-the-reader, ‚an ‚achieved‛ Utopia
– a full representation – is a contradiction in terms‛ (2007: 294). Here,
Jameson assumes an anthropocentric stfance in thinking about the
utopia; the achievement of a full representation of a human’s utopia
might be a contradictio in termini, but what about the SJ demon’s – or,
in general, any other existing nonhuman’s – utopia?

74

Is the

impossibility to achieve a full representation of what one has in mind
(e.g. an ideological society) what defines utopia? Is utopia indeed
‘nowhere’, as the literal translation of the word suggests, 75 or, as
suggested by LaBare, does it stay ‚where it is now: elsewhere‛ (2010:
118), not ruling out the possibility of its existence? Or, as presented in
SJ’s Eridanus sector, should we-the-human rule out the existence of
utopia if it is incompatible with the human? These are some of the
issues implied in SJ during the human investigation of the sector
Eridanus. If the human protagonist is killed in action, a brief
animation is shown wherein the earth is being consumed by the
Schwarzwelt and a message in red reads ‘Mission Failed’. Or did it?
Indeed, the eradication of the human might count as a failure for the
investigation mean, but also as a realisation of the nonhuman’s
utopia – and perhaps also James Lovelock’s – with nature’s
undisturbed regeneration

76

and the demon’s retrieval to their

perished godhood. Approaching the ontology of utopia from a
multispecies perspective – ‚by staging an encounter between the
human and the nonhuman‛ (Lamarre, 2008: 71-2) – highlights the
anthropocentric connotation of the conceptual utopia.

Defamiliarisations of whose present?
Having established and demonstrated the monstrous nature of the
‘monster’, this multispecies stance, let us-the-reader return to
In LaBare’s discussion on Jameson and the utopia, he rhetorically remarks that
mosquitoes are the only one willing to live in a mosquito’s utopia (2010: 118) and
continues to build on the anthropocentric assumption that we-the-human are working
towards an ‚impossible – because fractured, contradictory, multifarious – goal‛
(ibidem: 119-20).
75 When the word ‘utopia’ was coined by Thomas More for the title of his book Utopia
halfway through the sixteenth century, it was derived from the Greek words ou (‘not’,
negative) and topos (‘place’): nowhere.
76 Even though no mention is made about the nonhuman animal throughout SJ, it is
safe to assume that they were not part of the human eradication.
74

48

Jameson’s acknowledgement of a ‘complex temporal structure’ in sf
(i.e. the narrative mode of defamiliarisation of our own present
rather than an imagination of the future). SJ does not defamiliarise
‘our own present’ in Jameson’s sense of the argument; if anything, it
transgresses ‘our own present’ by providing a paraspace which
reflects human exceptionalism and exploits its consequences. The
Schwarzwelt

turns

the

subject-object

binary

table

through

‘dehumanisation’ of the subject, as became apparent in the case of
Zelenin’s capture for in vivo testing to contribute to the autonomous
demons’ knowledge of human biology.77
However, SJ does defamiliarise ‘our own present’ by questioning
what ‘our own present’ means. In order to elaborate on this question,
let us-the-reader return to the Schwarzwelt sector Eridanus. There
we meet the demon Thoth, derived from the eponymous Egyptian
deity. Unlike its more popular depiction of an ibis-headed male
entity, SJ’s director Kazuma Kaneko’s design of Thoth is portrayed as
a baboon (figure 3), wearing its headdress of a lunar disk on top of a
crescent moon whilst reading the Book of Thoth,78 the cover featuring
multiple Egyptian symbols.79 Thoth informs the player that in ancient
times he was being worshipped by humans as a deity of knowledge,
i.e. he is conscious of history and his past, after which he presents the
player with the task of retrieving volumes from his book; he does so
in a ludic manner by providing cryptic descriptions of another
demon that holds of one of the volumes.

Obviously, this might be interpreted as critique on the use of non-human animals in
experiments.
78 According to the Egyptian tale ‘Setne Khamwas and Naneferkaptah’, the radiating
book written by the deity Thoth contained two spells: the first enabled its human
caster to speak the nonhuman animal tongue; the second enabled its human caster to
perceive divine entities (Lichtheim, 1975: 127-9). The abilities of the Book of Thoth
correspond with the standard functions of the Demonica suit in SJ.
79 The Book of Thoth the SJ Thoth is holding features two mirrored versions of the Eye
of Horus (symbolising healing and protection); the djed hieroglyph (referring to
stability and the symbolic backbone of deity Osiris) and a hieroglyph reminiscent of a
highly simplified form of Ma’at’s feather. The arrangement of symbols on SJ’s Book of
Thoth represents a face.
77

49

Figure 3: The demon Thoth as it appears in SJ (Kaneko, 2008: 588).

What is arguably most intriguing about this scene is how it
challenges notions of time and Jameson’s ‘complex temporal
structure’. What we-the-reader see here is the encounter between an
object from the past (the deity Thoth) and a subject from the present
(the human investigator), in a space that represents an impossible
utopic future for the subject, yet the present and the possible utopic
future for the object from the past. In other words, what Thoth –
conscious of his godhood in ancient times – considers as the present
(i.e., peacefully reading his book in sector Eridanus) is what is
possible outside the Schwarzwelt paraspace and will become reality
once the Schwarzwelt consumes planet earth (and the distinction
50

between ‘normal’ space and paraspace dissolves). Simultaneously,
the human investigator explores the multiple paraspaces of the
Schwarzwelt, in which the spatial dimension of each paraspace is
indexable according to spatial dimensions known through historical
accounts on earth in the ‘normal’ space. Without trespassing too
much in the domain of time and space philosophy, I would like to
emphasise that in the paraspace where the human investigator
encounters Thoth, the human is – as a matter of fact – present in what
Jameson has described as a contradiction in terms: a full
representation of an ‚achieved‛ Utopia (Jameson, 2007: 294).
Whereas I agree with Jameson that a realised utopia is indeed a
contradiction in terms – suggesting there is a problem with the
terminology – this section has distinguished the human’s utopia
Jameson is concerned with and the nonhuman’s utopia, as is a
prevalent theme in SJ.
Of course, one might ask, SJ is a popular work of fiction, building
on an often criticised Gaia hypothesis and developed for commercial
purposes – what is in it for us? Taking an ecofeminist stance, SJ offers
a critical demonstration of ‘somersaulting’80 the subject-object binary.
Leaving their anthropocentric life on earth behind, the members of
the SJ investigation team – agents of the human – become trapped in
this ‘somersaulted’ Schwarzwelt, where ‘anti-human exceptionalism’
reigns; where the once superior human is degraded to an object – a
mere object repurposed for experiments to benefit the nonhuman;
where nature and technology exist in perfect co-existence; where the
human’s unrealisable utopia is realised only through the absence of
the human – the confirmation that utopia is incompatible with the
human.
The SJ demon, born as anti-bodies from and for human
exceptionalism, is a true Derridean monster in both the figurative as
the literal sense: ‚it shows itself [elle se montre+ (<) in something that
is not yet shown and that therefore looks like a hallucination‛ (1995:

Derived from LaBare, the ‘somersault’ implies more dimensions of reversal than an
ordinary reversal (2010: 89), which is appropriate in the context of a reversal of the allencompassing binary of subject-object.
80

51

386) or the sudden appearance of the Schwarzwelt. It critiques the
ontology of the human – ‚A lamentable mistake birthed by the
waters of life. (<) Break apart, you sinful clumps of matter!‛ (SJ
demon lord Ouroboros Maia) – and the norm established by the
human – ‚the foolish notion of ‚order‛ has caused the human spirit
to wither and decay‛ (SJ demon lord Asura). ‚Faced with a monster‛,
Derrida argued, ‚one may become aware of what the norm is and
when this norm has a history‛, allowing ‚an analysis of the history of
the norms‛ (ibidem: 385-6). The act of exposing the agent of the norm
– the human – to the monster – the demon – is precisely what
happens during one of SJ’s endings: the player sides with Jimenez,
the demon and thus the monster, acknowledging the stigma of
human exceptionalism – the human failure to treat the nonhuman
with respect – and, as the agent of the norm, to mend human’s failure
through eradication of the human.
If the reader now would conclude that this is a sad conclusion to
what has been a harsh journey, one has missed the objective of this
thesis’ ‘monster.’

52

Conclusion

By grafting monsters from establishing theories – Bakhtin’s literary
mode of ‘grotesque realism’, Foucault’s taxonomy defining monster,
Derrida’s

normality

exposing

monster,

Haraway’s

gender

transgressing cyborg and Latour’s ontologically untranslated hybrid
– and the human-nonhuman-machine interface from SJ onto each
other, this thesis has composited a discursive ‘monster’ to make its
reader aware of

the culturally normal fantasy of

‘human

exceptionalism.’ As if dealing with anatomical dissection, the first
section deconstructed the ‘monster’ to examine its theoretical carcass
and describe the function of each conceptual bone. The second
section was concerned with the conceptual physiology of the
‘monster’, e.g. the correlation between and interdependence of the
uncanny and intimate virtuality in Shin Megami Tensei. Having
determined the innate nature of this thesis’ ‘monster’ as ‘anti-human
exceptionalistic’, the interest of the third section in the ecology of the
discursive ‘monster’ in relation to other discourses led to a
highlighting of the anthropocentric nature of, in this case, the
understanding of utopia.
It requires more than a singular thesis to domesticate a ‘monster’,
to make it a pet. Among the many questions posed during the
examination of the ‘monster’, however, there is one – as posed at the
beginning of this thesis – that must be answered today:

How does the discursive ‘monster’ constructed throughout this thesis force
its reader to become aware of the history of normality?

The monster, as a grotesque exception to the norm, inhabits the
negative space that envelops the norm and in doing so, it enables one
53

to identify the norm, to provide it with taxonomy, to institutionalise
it, or to make one aware about the history of this norm. It should be
noted that it is not a passive concept but an active and pragmatic
construct that more than once violates the norm. Such collisions
result in events, sometimes traumatic, that require a translation or
purification to be comprehended within the domain of the norm,
leading to an adjustment of the norm: the movement of culture.
The discursive ‘monster’ proposed in this thesis has not been able
to move culture nor was it its intent to move culture; it would not
have been able to, as the movement of culture requires multiple
collisions between a monster and the norm before it is able to affect
the latter. Nonetheless, the ‘monster’ did make the reader aware of
the anthropocentric nature of established notions of utopia and
violated this norm, if only a little. Further violations by this or a
similar discursive ‘monster’ are required in order to affect culture.
For now, this thesis has been deliberately highlighting its function
as a monstrosity, unlike, for example, the core arguments in Mikhail
Bakhtin’s controversial dissertation (q.v. note 28). This has two main
reasons: first, it is necessary to understand the complex interaction of
theories within the theoretical framework of the discursive ‘monster’;
and second, it marks the parallel between the monstrous function of
the SJ demon as the antibody for human exceptionalism within the
diegetic reality and the ‘monster’ as the antibody for human
exceptionalism within the field of sf studies.

For the sake of a brief critical reflection, I will conclude by providing
counterarguments for a particular assumption – and perhaps I have
procrastinated doing this for too long – that was required to violate
Jameson’s celebrated 1982 essay. Of course, the word ‘utopia’ is a
man-made construct to describe a ‘nowhere’, which it literally means.
Arguing that the demon’s utopia may exist but may be incompatible
with the human is, indeed, a contradiction in terms. Why would a
man-made linguistic construct be incompatible with the human yet
compatible with the nonhuman? It is at this point where I ran into

54

the limitations of language: how do I meaningfully convey my
philosophical thoughts through man-made linguistic constructs?
Regardless of whether these philosophical thoughts are derived from
experiences that have been subjected to heuristic judgement (in
contrast to pure experience), it is impossible for a human to
meaningfully convey or understand the ideas of a nonhuman in a
nonhuman language – that is, until nonhuman animals reach the
evolutionary stage wherein they will be able to meaningfully
communicate with us-the-human.

55

Works cited

Allison, Anne. Millennial Monsters: Japanese Toys and the Global
Imagination. Berkeley: University of California Press, 2006.

Atari. Pong. Atari, 1972. Arcade.

Atlus. Shin Megami Tensei. Atlus, 1992. Super Famicom.

---. Shin Megami Tensei II. Atlus, 1994. Super Famicom.

---. Shin Megami Tensei III: Lucifer’s Call. Ubisoft, 2003. PlayStation 2.

---. Shin Megami Tensei: Persona 4. Square Enix, 2009. PlayStation 2.

---. Shin Megami Tensei: Strange Journey. Atlus, 2010. Nintendo DS.

Azuma, Hiroki. Otaku: Japan’s Database Animals. Trans. Jonathan E.
Abel and Shion Kono. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press,
2009.

Ashkenazi, Michael. Handbook of Japanese mythology. Oxford: ABCCLIO, 2003.

Bakhtin, Mikhail. Rabelais and his World. 1965. Trans. Helene Iswolsky.
Indiana University Press, 1984.

Blasingim, Kieran G. ‚Hero myths in Japanese Role-playing Games.‛
MA thesis Bowling Green State University, 2006. Web. 12 May 2011.

56

<http://etd.ohiolink.edu/send-pdf.cgi/Blasingim%20Kerry.
pdf?bgsu1147711469>

Botting, Fred. Limits of horror: Technology, bodies, Gothic. Manchester
University Press, 2006.

Brown, Emily and Cairns, Paul (2004). ‚A grounded investigation of
game immersion‛, in CHI '04 Extended Abstracts on Human Factors in
Computing Systems, Vienna, 24-29 April 2004. New York: ACM New
York, 2004. 1297-1300. < http://dl.acm.org/citation.cfm?id=986048>

Bukatman, Scott. ‚Paraspace.‛ Terminal Identity: The Virtual Subject in
Postmodern Science Fiction. 1993. Duke University Press, 2002. 157-182.

Copier, Marinka. Beyond the magic circle: A network perspective on roleplay in online games. Utrecht University, 2007.

Cumiskey, Kathleen. ‚‘Can you hear me now?’: Paradoxes of technointimacy resulting from the public use of mobile communication
technology.‛ A sense of place: The global and the local in mobile
communication. Ed. Kristóf Nyíri. Vienna: Passagen, 2005. 151-158.

De Vries, Imar. ‚The vanishing points of mobile communication.‛
Digital Material: Tracing New Media in Everyday Life and Technology.
Eds. Marianne van den Boomen et al. Amsterdam University Press,
2009. 81-94.

Delaney, Samuel R. ‚Is Cyberpunk a Good Thing or a Bad Thing?‛
Mississippi Review 16.2-3 (1988). 28-35.

Derrida, Jacques (1989). ‚Some Statements and Truisms about
Neologisms, Newisms, Postisms, Parasitisms, and other small
Seismisms.‛ The States of Theory. Ed. David Carroll. New York:
Columbia University Press. 63-94.

57

---. ‚Passages–from Traumatism to Promise.‛ Points…: Interview,
1974-1994. Stanford University Press, 1995. 372-395.

Famitsu Shoseki Henshūbu, ed. Shin Megami Tensei STRANGE
JOURNEY Kōshiki pāfekuto gaido [Official Perfect Guide]. Tokyo:
Enterbrain, 2009.

Foucault, Michel. Power/Knowledge: Selected Interviews and Other
Writings, 1972-1977. Ed. Colin Gordon. Trans. Leo Marshall, John
Mepham and Kate Soper. New York: Pantheon Books, 1980.

---. The Order of Things: An archaeology of the human sciences. 1966.
Routledge, 2005.

Freud, Sigmund. ‚The Uncanny.‛ 1919. The Standard Edition of the
Complete Psychological Works of Sigmund Freud, Volume XVII (19171919): An Infantile Neurosis and Other Works. Hogarth Press, 1953. 217256.

Galbraith, Patrick W. ‚Bishōjo Games: ‘Techno-Intimacy’ and the
Virtually Human in Japan.‛ Game Studies 11.2 (May 2011). Web. 15
June 2012. <http://gamestudies.org/1102/articles/galbraith>

Game Freak. Pokémon Black Version and White Version. Nintendo, 2011.
Nintendo DS.

Gust and Branpesto. Ar tonelico Qoga: Knell of Ar Ciel. THQ, 2011.
PlayStation 3.

Haraway, Donna. ‚A Cyborg Manifesto: Science, Technology, and
Socialist-Feminism in the Late Twentieth Century.‛ Simians, Cyborgs
and Women: The Reinvention of Nature. New York: Routledge, 1991.
149-181.

58

---. ‚Cyborgs to Companion Species: Reconfiguring Kinship in
Technoscience.‛ Chasing Technoscience. Eds. Don Ihde and Evan
Sellinger. Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 2003a. 58-72.

---. The Companion Species Manifesto: Dogs, People and Significant
Otherness. Chicago: Prickly Paradigm Press, 2003b.

---. When Species Meet. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press,
2008.

Hegel, Georg W.F. The Philosophy of History. 1900. Trans. J. Jibree.
New York: Dover, 1956.

Holquist, Michael (Ed.) ‚Introduction.‛ The Dialogic Imagination. Four
Essays. Bakhtin, M. M. Trans. Caryl Emerson and Michael Holquist.
University of Texas Press, 1982. xv-xxxiii.

‚Ishibutai Kofun‛. Asukanet. Asuka Historical Museum, 1995. Web. 6
August 2012. <http://www.asukanet.gr.jp/asukahome/ASUKA2/ASU
KAKOFUN/isibutaiK.html>

Jameson,

Fredric.

The

Political

Unconscious.

London:

Cornel

University Press, 1981.

---. ‚Postmodernism and Consumer Society.‛ Post-Modern Culture. Ed.
Hal Foster. London: Pluto Press, 1983. 111-125.

---. Archaeologies of the Future: The Desire Called Utopia and Other
Science Fictions. 2005. London & New York: Verso, 2007.

Jentsch, Ernst. ‚On the Psychology of the Uncanny.‛ 1906. Angelaki
2.1 (1996). Trans. Roy Sellars. 7-16.

59

Kalata, Kurt and Snelgrove, Christopher J. ‚Hardcore Gaming 101:
Megami Tensei / Shin Megami Tensei.‛ Hardcore Gaming 101, n.d.
Web. 8 June 2012. <http://www.hardcoregaming101.net/megaten/
megaten.htm>

Kaneko, Kazuma. Kazuma Kaneko Works III. Tokyo: Shinkigensha,
2008.

Konami. LovePlus. Konami, 2009. Nintendo DS.

LaBare, Joshua. ‚Farfetchings: on and in the sf mode.‛ Dissertation
University of California, Santa Cruz, 2010.

Lamarre, Thomas. ‚Speciesism Part 1: Translating Races into
Animals in Wartime Animation.‛ Mechademia 3 (2008). 75-95.

---. The Anime Machine: A Media Theory of Animation. Minneapolis:
University of Minnesota Press, 2009.

---. ‚Speciesism Part 2: Tezuka Osamu and the Multispecies Ideal.‛
Mechademia 4 (2010). 51-85.

Lang, Franz, dir. Metropolis. 1927. Eureka, 2005. Film.

Latour, Bruno. We Have Never Been Modern. Trans. Chaterine Porter.
Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1993.

---. ‚From Realpolitik to Dingpolitik: How to Make Things Public. An
Introduction.‛ Making Things Public. Atmospheres of Democracy. Trans.
Bruno Latour & Peter Weibel. Cambridge, MA: MIT Press, 2005. 1-31.

Lichtheim, Miriam. Ancien Egyptian Literature. Volume III: The Late
Period. London: University of California Press, 1973.

60

Loe, Casey. ‚The Demon Whisperer.‛ Nintendo Power 251 (February
2010). 70-72.

Lovelock, James.Gaia: A New Look at Life on Earth. 1979. Oxford:
Oxford University Press, 2000.

Lurker, Manfred. The Routledge Dictionary of Gods and Goddesses,
Devils and Demons. Routledge, 2004.

Manovich, Lev. ‚Assembling Reality: Myths of Computer Graphics.‛
Afterimage 20.2 (1992). Web. 19 June 2012. <http://www.manovich.
net/TEXT/assembling.html >

---. The Language of New Media. Cambridge: MIT Press, 2001.

McHale, Brian. Postmodernist Fiction. New York: Methuen, 1987.

McMahan, Alison. ‚Immersion, Engagement, and Presence: A
Method for Analyzing 3-D Video Games.‛ The Video Game Theory
Reader. Eds. Mark J.P. Wolf and Bernard Perron. Routledge, 2003.

Milburn, Colin Nazhone. ‚Monsters in Eden: Darwin and Derrida‛,
in MLN 118.3 (April 2003, German Issue). 603-621.

Moore, Ed. ‚Interview: Behind the Scenes of Shin Megami Tensei.‛ The
Escapist. Themis Media, 11 November 2010. Web. 10 August 2012.
<http://www.escapistmagazine.com/articles/view/editorials/intervie
ws/8280-Interview-Behind-the-Scenes-of-Shin-Megami-Tensei>

Nakamura, Miri. ‚Horror and Machines in Prewar Japan: The
Mechanical Uncanny in Yumeno Kyūsaku’s Dogura magura.‛ Robot
Ghosts and Wired Dreams: Japanese science fiction from origins to anime,
Ed. Christopher Bolton. Trans. Kotani Mari. Minneapolis: Minnesota
Press, 2007. 3-26.

61

Nelson, Robin. ‚Prospective Mapping‛, in Mapping Intermediality in
Performance. Eds. Sarah Bay-Chengs et al. University of Amsterdam
Press, 2010. 13-23.

Nishikubo, Mizuho, dir. Digital Devil Monogatari Megami Tensei. 1987.
Kiseki Films, 2001. Film.

Nishitani, Aya. Digital Devil Story: Megami Tensei. Tokyo: Tokuma
Shoten, 1986.

Nomura, Tetsuya, dir. Final Fantasy VII: Advent Children. 2005. Sony
Pictures, 2006.

Oliver, Evelyn Dorothy and Lewis, James R. Angels A to Z. Canton:
Visible Ink Press, 2008.

Royle, Nicholas. The Uncanny. Vancouver: Manchester University
Press, 2003.

Said, Edward W. Orientalism. London: Penguin Books, 1995.

Saitō, Tamaki. ‚Otaku Sexuality.‛ Robot Ghosts and Wired Dreams:
Japanese science fiction from origins to anime. Ed. Christopher Bolton.
Trans. Kotani Mari. Minneapolis: Minnesota Press, 2007. 222-249.

‚Shin

Megami

Tensei

STRANGE

JOURNEY

Schwarzwelt

Reminiscences‛. Minus. 20 Aug. 2012. <http://nightphaser.minus.
com/mSBKbZ7Ko/>

Square. Final Fantasy VII. Square, 1997. PlayStation.

Stalling, Jonathan. Poetics of Emptiness: Transformations of Asian
Thought in American Poetry. Fordham University Press, 2010.

62

Tsing, Anna. ‚Unruly Edges: Mushrooms as Companion Species‛.
Thinking

with

Cambridge:

Donna

MIT

Haraway.

Press,

Ed.

Sharon

forthcoming.

Web.

Ghamari-Tabrizi.
29

July

2012.

<http://wwwprod.lsa.umich.edu/UMICH/cseas/Academics/Conferec
es/Tsing%20Mushrooms.pdf>

Turkle, Sherry. Alone Together: Why We Expect More from Technology
and Less from Each Other. New York: Basic Books, 2011.

Van Zoggel, Guan. ‚Reach Out To The Truth: Japanse role-playing
game Persona 4 als maatschappelijk discussieplatform.‛ BA thesis
Leiden University,

2011a.

Web.

2

August 2012.

<http://uu.

academia.edu/GuanvanZoggel/Papers/930827/Reach_Out_To_The_T
ruth_Japanse_role-playing_game_Persona_4_als_maatschappelijk_
discussieplatform>

Van Zoggel, Guan. ‚Serious ‘techno-intimacy’: Perceiving Japanese
dating simulation video games as serious games.‛ Utrecht University,
2011b.

Web.

2

August

2012.

<http://uu.academia.edu/

GuanvanZoggel/Papers/1178613/Serious_techno-intimacy_Perceiving_Japanese_dating_simulation_video_games_as_serious_games>

Varley, Paul. Japanese Culture. Fourth Edition. 1973. Honolulu:
University of Hawai’i Press, 2000.

Wells, Paul. The Animated Bestiary: Animals, Cartoons, and Culture.
Rutger University Press, 2009.

Yamaguchi, Masao. ‚Karakuri: the ludic relationship between man
and machine in Tokugawa Japan‛, Japan at Play. Eds. Joy Henry &
Massimo Raveri. London: Routledge, 2002. 72-83.

63


